   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.google-analytics.com/gtm/ns?id=GTM-KJFLHK

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TDTFTZ

     * (BUTTON) Search
     * (BUTTON) Discover
          + Fundraisers
          + Success Stories
     * (BUTTON) Fundraise for
          + Medical
          + Memorial
          + Emergency
          + Nonprofit
          + Education
          + See all

   (BUTTON)
   Search GoFundMe
   ____________________ (BUTTON)
   See all results for
     *

   (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON) How it works
          + How it works
            How GoFundMe works
            What is crowdfunding?
            Free fundraising
          + Plan your fundraiser
            Team fundraising
            Fundraising tips
            Fundraising ideas
     * Sign in
     * Start a GoFundMe

   (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON) Discover
          + Fundraisers
          + Success Stories
     * (BUTTON) Fundraise for
          + Medical
          + Memorial
          + Emergency
          + Nonprofit
          + Education
          + See all
     * (BUTTON) How it works
          + How GoFundMe works
          + What is crowdfunding?
          + Free fundraising
     * (BUTTON) Plan your fundraiser
          + Team fundraising
          + Fundraising tips
          + Fundraising ideas
     * Sign in
     * Start a GoFundMe

Free fundraising for the people and causes you care about

   Starting is easy. 0% platform fee*.
   Start a GoFundMe
   Paola raised over €136,000 to expand her wildlife sanctuary and save
   more animals in need.
   George’s family raised $8k for a new wheelchair to get him moving
   again.
   In 2017, the GoFundMe community raised millions of dollars for
   hurricane relief efforts. (Photo by The National Guard, CC, Adapted)
   The BFC Preussen team raised more than €1,200 for transportation to
   competitions.
   *Standard transaction fees apply to credit and debit card transactions
   Paola raised over €136,000 to expand her wildlife sanctuary and save
   more animals in need.
   George’s family raised $8k for a new wheelchair to get him moving
   again.
   In 2017, the GoFundMe community raised millions of dollars for
   hurricane relief efforts. (Photo by The National Guard, CC, Adapted)
   The BFC Preussen team raised more than €1,200 for transportation to
   competitions.

Free fundraising for the people and causes you care about

   Starting is easy. 0% platform fee*.
   Start a GoFundMe
   *Standard transaction fees apply to credit and debit card transactions

Start fundraising today

   More money raised online than anywhere else. Learn about how GoFundMe
   works.
   For yourself
   For a friend

   GoFundMe fundraising stories
   Fighting persecution abroad

   To help protect the vulnerable LGBT community in Chechnya, Guillaume
   and Benjamin raised €27,550 from more than 700 donors.
   GoFundMe fundraising stories
   Hope for a special needs child

   To help her autistic daughter cope with significant cognitive and
   social challenges, Justine raised €11,935 for behavioral therapy.
   GoFundMe fundraising stories
   A community to the rescue

   The mountaineering community raised €160,223 to rescue Elisabeth and to
   help the wife and children of her climbing partner Tomek, who lost his
   life on the mountain.

Over 10,000 people start a GoFundMe every day

   Medical
   Memorial
   Emergency
   Nonprofit
   Education
   Animals
   Business
   Community
   Competition
   Creative
   Event
   Faith
   Family
   Newlywed
   Sports
   Travel
   Volunteer
   Wishes
   Show all categories

Ready to start fundraising?

   Start a GoFundMe

   [English (US)]
   Fundraise for
     * Medical
     * Emergency
     * Memorial
     * Education
     * Charity
     * Nonprofit organization

   Learn more
     * How GoFundMe works
     * Why GoFundMe
     * Common questions
     * Success stories
     * Supported countries

   Resources
     * Help center
     * Blog
     * GoFundMe Stories
     * Press center
     * Careers
     * About

   © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.google-analytics.com/gtm/ns?id=GTM-KJFLHK

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TDTFTZ

   GoFundMe (BUTTON)

   Raise money for any cause
   Start a GoFundMe
     * Home
     * Sign up
     * How it works
     * Help
     * Sign in

     * ____________________

     * Start a GoFundMe

   (BUTTON)
   ____________________

     Try searching for locations, campaign titles and names
     * Explore Category
     * Medical
       Medical
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Surgery Financial Help
          + Gender Confirmation Surgery Guide
          + Medical Campaigns
          + Cancer
          + Breast Cancer
          + IVF
     * Volunteer
       Volunteer
       View All
          + Volunteer Campaigns
     * Emergencies
       Emergencies
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Paying for Hurricanes, Storms, Floods, Fires
          + Emergencies Campaigns
     * Education
       Education
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Fundraising Ideas for School Clubs
          + Education Campaigns
          + Extracurriculars
          + College Tuition
          + Classroom
     * Memorials
       Memorials
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + How to Set up a Memorial Fund
          + Funeral & Memorial Costs Guide
          + Memorials Campaigns
     * Sports
       Sports
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Raising Money for Cheerleading & Dance
          + Sports Campaigns
     * Animals
       Animals
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Saving Money on Vet Bills
          + Pet Fundraising: 5 Tips
          + Animals Campaigns
     * Wishes
       Wishes
       View All
          + Wishes Campaigns
     * Competitions
       Competitions
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Guide to Beauty Pageants on a Budget
          + Competitions Campaigns
     * Other
       Other
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Financial Help for Veterans
          + Other Campaigns
     * Newlyweds
       Newlyweds
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Saving Money on Weddings
          + Newlyweds Campaigns
     * Charity
       Charity
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Helping a Charity Fundraise
          + Charity Campaigns
     * Faith
       Faith
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Fundraising for Your Church
          + Faith Campaigns
     * Travel
       Travel
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + How to Deal with Travel Costs
          + Travel Campaigns
     * Creative
       Creative
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + 5 Tips to Make Money as an Artist
          + Creative Campaigns
     * Community
       Community
       View All
          + Community Campaigns
     * Events
       Events
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Event Planning on a Budget
          + Events Campaigns
     * Business
       Business
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Guide to Saving Local Businesses, Restaurants & Stores
          + Business Campaigns
     * Family
       Family
       View All
          + Family Campaigns

GoFundMe Terms & Conditions

Questions about our terms? Contact Us

   Date of Last Revision: May 20, 2019

   GoFundMe, Inc. provides its platform to you through its website and
   mobile applications (the "Platform") and related services
   (collectively, the Platform, including any new features and
   applications, the "Services"), subject to the following terms of
   service, as amended from time to time (the "Terms of Service"). If you
   are a campaign organizer (as defined below) or donor (a campaign
   organizer and a donor shall be collectively referred to herein as a
   “User”) located in the United States, you are contracting with
   GoFundMe, Inc., 855 Jefferson Avenue, Redwood City, CA, 94063. If you
   are a User located outside of the United States but not in Australia,
   you are contracting with GoFundMe Ireland, Ltd., 70 Sir John Rogersons
   Quay, Dublin 2. If you are a User located in Australia you are
   contracting with GoFundMe Australia PTY Ltd., Tower One – International
   Towers Sydney, Level 46, 100 Barangaroo Avenue, 2000, Sydney, NSW. For
   purposes of the following Terms of Service, “GoFundMe,” “we,” “us,”
   “our,” and other similar terms, shall refer to the party with whom you
   are contracting.

   ARBITRATION, JURY TRIAL, AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER: EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE
   DESCRIBED IN THE DISPUTES SECTION BELOW, BY USING THE SERVICES, YOU
   AGREE THAT DISPUTES BETWEEN US WILL BE RESOLVED BY BINDING, INDIVIDUAL
   ARBITRATION AND YOU WAIVE YOUR RIGHT TO A JURY TRIAL OR TO PARTICIPATE
   IN A CLASS ACTION. PLEASE REVIEW THE DISPUTES SECTION CAREFULLY; BY
   ENTERING THIS AGREEMENT, YOU EXPRESSLY ACKNOWLEDGE THAT YOU HAVE READ
   AND UNDERSTAND ALL OF THE TERMS OF THIS AGREEMENT.

   We reserve the right, at our sole discretion, to change or modify
   portions of these Terms of Service at any time. When we do this, we
   will post the revised Terms of Service on this page and will indicate
   the date of such revision.

   Your continued use of the Services after the date of any such changes
   constitutes your acceptance of the new Terms of Service. To the extent
   allowed by law, the English version of these Terms of Service is
   binding and other translations are for convenience only. If you do not
   wish to accept the new Terms of Service, you may discontinue your use
   of the Services.

   In addition, when using the Services, and unless you are in Europe, you
   will be subject to additional applicable policies including without
   limitation, the Privacy Policy located at
   https://fr.gofundme.com/privacy. All such terms are hereby incorporated
   by reference into these Terms of Service (provided, however, these
   Terms of Service will take precedence in the event of conflict). We
   shall resolve any such conflicts in our sole discretion, and all of our
   determinations are final.
   Access and Use of the Services

   Services Description: The Services are offered as a platform to allow
   an individual (the "Campaign Organizer") to post a fundraising campaign
   ("Campaign") to the Platform to accept monetary donations ("Donations")
   from donors ("Donors").

   Although there are no fees to set up a Campaign, industry-standard
   transaction fees apply (hereinafter and on the website referred to as
   "Transaction Fees") to the Services rendered to Campaign Organizers. To
   learn more about GoFundMe’s Platform and applicable Transaction Fees,
   visit https://www.gofundme.com/why-gofundme.

   The Services are a platform; We are not a Broker, Financial
   Institution, Creditor or Charity: The Services are an administrative
   platform only. GoFundMe facilitates the Campaign of the Campaign
   Organizers and permits Donors to make donations to these Campaign
   Organizers. GoFundMe is not a broker, agent, financial institution,
   creditor or 501(c)(3) nonprofit corporation (“Charity”)

   All information and content provided by GoFundMe relating to the
   Services is for informational purposes only, and GoFundMe does not
   guarantee the accuracy, completeness, timeliness or reliability of any
   such information or content. No content is intended to provide
   financial, legal, tax or other professional advice. Before making any
   decisions regarding any Campaigns, Charities, Donations, Donors, or any
   information or content relating to the Services, you should consult
   your financial, legal, tax or other professional advisor as
   appropriate. You acknowledge that all information and content accessed
   by you using the Services is at your own risk.

   GoFundMe has no control over the conduct of, or any information
   provided by, a Campaign Organizer, a Charity, or other user and hereby
   disclaims all liability in this regard to the fullest extent permitted
   by applicable law. We do not guarantee that a Campaign or a Charity
   will obtain a certain amount of Donations or any Donations at all. We
   do not endorse any Campaign, Campaign Organizer, or Charity, and we
   make no guarantee, express or implied, that any information provided
   through the Services is accurate. We expressly disclaim any liability
   or responsibility for the outcome or success of any Campaign. You, as a
   Donor, must make the final determination as to the value and
   appropriateness of contributing to any Campaign, Campaign Organizer, or
   Charity.

   All Donations are at your own risk. When you make a Donation through
   the Services, it is your responsibility to understand how your money
   will be used. GoFundMe is not responsible for any offers, promises,
   rewards or promotions made or offered by Charities, Campaigns or
   Campaign Organizers. We do not and cannot verify the information that
   Campaign Organizers supply, nor do we represent or guarantee that the
   Donations will be used in accordance with any fundraising purpose
   prescribed by a Campaign Organizer or Charity or in accordance with
   applicable laws. Notwithstanding the foregoing, we take possible
   fraudulent activity and the misuse of funds raised very seriously. You
   can learn more about our Fraud Policy at
   https://fr.gofundme.com/safety. If you have reason to believe that a
   Campaign Organizer or Charity is not raising or using the funds for
   their stated purpose, please use the "Report" button on the Campaign or
   Charity to alert our team of this potential issue and we will
   investigate. If you are a donor, you may also be covered by the
   GoFundMe Guarantee. Policy details are located at
   https://fr.gofundme.com/guarantee-refund-policy.

   You, as a Campaign Organizer, represent, warrant, and covenant that (i)
   all information you provide in connection with a Campaign is accurate,
   complete, and not likely to deceive reasonable Users; (ii) all
   Donations contributed to your Campaign will be used solely as described
   in the materials that you post or otherwise provide; (iii) you will not
   infringe the rights of others; (iv) you will comply with all relevant
   and applicable financial reporting obligations, including but not
   limited to laws and regulations relating to tax reporting, political
   contributions, and asset disclosures for your project; and (v) to the
   extent you share with us any personal data of any third party for any
   purpose, including the names, email addresses and phone numbers of your
   personal contacts, you have the authority (including any necessary
   consents), as required under applicable law, to provide us with such
   personal data and allow us to use such personal data for the purposes
   for which you shared it with us. You authorize GoFundMe, and GoFundMe
   reserves the right to, provide information relating to your Campaign to
   Donors, beneficiaries of your Campaign or law enforcement, and to
   assist in any investigation thereof.

   Your Registration Obligations: You may be required to register with
   GoFundMe in order to access and use certain features of the Services.
   If you choose to register for the Services, you agree to provide and
   maintain true, accurate, current and complete information about
   yourself as prompted by the Services' registration form. Campaign
   Organizers must register using their true identities, including their
   name and any image or video purporting to depict the Campaign Organizer
   or the beneficiary of such campaign. Registration data and certain
   other information about you are governed by our Privacy Policy. If you
   are under 13 years of age (16 in Europe), you are not authorized to use
   the Services, with or without registering. In addition, if you are
   under the age of majority in your jurisdiction (typically 18 or 19
   years of age), you may use the Services, with or without registering,
   only with the approval of your parent or guardian. Certain aspects of
   our Services may also require you to register with, and agree to the
   terms of, third-party service providers (e.g., payment processors),
   with whom GoFundMe has entered into contracts, in order to be able to
   benefit from their services. If GoFundMe or one of our payments
   processors at any time discovers that the information you provided
   about you or the purpose of your Campaign is incorrect or violates any
   of these Terms of Service or their terms of service, the Services may
   be suspended and/or terminated with immediate effect and fines may be
   applied by the relevant authorities which will in all such cases be
   payable by you. You acknowledge and agree that the use of third party
   payment processors are integral to the Services and that we may
   exchange information with such third parties in order to facilitate the
   provision of Services as set out in our Privacy Policy.

   Taxes: It is your responsibility to determine what, if any, taxes apply
   to the Donations you receive through your use of the Services. It is
   solely your responsibility to assess, collect, report or remit the
   correct tax, if any, to the appropriate tax authority.

   Member Account, Password and Security: You are responsible for
   maintaining the confidentiality of your password and account, if any,
   and are fully responsible for any and all activities that occur under
   your password or account. You agree to (a) immediately notify GoFundMe
   of any unauthorized use of your password or account or any other breach
   of security, and (b) sign out from your account at the end of each
   session when accessing the Services. GoFundMe will not be liable for
   any loss or damage arising from your failure to comply with this
   Section.

   Modifications to Services: GoFundMe reserves the right to modify,
   suspend or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, the Services (or
   any part thereof) at any time and for any reason, with or without
   notice, and without any liability to you or to any third party for any
   claims, damages, costs, or losses resulting therefrom.

   Public Content; Public Display of Donations: Some of your activity on
   and through the Services is public, such as content you post publicly
   on the website. Additionally, user profile information, including your
   first and last name, public email address, organization, personal
   biography, and other information you enter in connection with your user
   profile may be displayed to other users to facilitate user interaction
   within the Services. For example, as a Donor, you have the option to
   publicly display your Donation for all to see, including on search
   engines (like Google and Yahoo). To keep the details of your Donation
   private, simply click the "Private" checkbox during the Donation
   process. Please remember that if you choose to provide information
   using certain public features of the Services, then that information is
   governed by the privacy settings of those particular features and may
   be publicly available. Individuals reading such information may use or
   disclose it to other individuals or entities without our knowledge and
   without your knowledge, and search engines may index that information.
   We therefore urge you to think carefully about including any specific
   information you may deem private in content that you create or
   information that you submit through the Services. Please see our
   Privacy Policy for information on the ways that we may collect, use,
   and store certain information about you and your use of the Services.

   Promotions: You are not permitted to offer any contest, competition
   giveaway, sweepstakes or similar activity (each, a "Promotion") on or
   through the Services without our prior written consent which consent
   may be withheld in our sole and absolute discretion. You may seek
   permission by sending an email to promotions@gofundme.com.

   Data Retention You acknowledge that GoFundMe has no obligation to you
   to retain data relating to any account or campaign. You acknowledge
   that GoFundMe reserves the right to delete data or to terminate
   accounts or Campaigns at any time and for any reason, with or without
   notice, and without any liability to you or to any third party for any
   claims, damages, costs or losses resulting therefrom.

   Mobile Services: The Services include certain features that may be made
   available via a mobile device, including the ability to (i) upload
   content to the Platform, (ii) browse the Platform and (iii) access
   certain items through an application downloaded and installed on a
   mobile device (collectively, the "Mobile Services"). To the extent you
   access Mobile Services, your wireless service carrier's standard
   charges, data rates and other fees may apply. In addition, downloading,
   installing, or using certain Mobile Services may be prohibited or
   restricted by your carrier, and not all Mobile Services may work with
   all carriers or devices. By using the Mobile Services, you agree that
   we may communicate with you by SMS, MMS, text message or other
   electronic means to your mobile device and that certain information
   about your usage of the Mobile Services may be communicated to us. We
   shall comply with any additional requirements that may apply under
   local laws and regulations before communicating with you in this
   manner. In the event that you change or deactivate your mobile
   telephone number, you agree to promptly update your GoFundMe account
   information to ensure that your messages are not sent to the person
   that acquires your old number.
   Prohibited Conduct

   User Conduct: You are solely responsible for all Campaign descriptions,
   comments, videos, images, information, data, text, software, music,
   sound, photographs, graphics, messages or other materials (the
   "Content") that you upload, post, publish, display, transmit or
   otherwise use (hereinafter, "Upload") via the Services. If you are not
   the beneficiary of the Campaign you organize, you agree to deliver
   funds to the ultimate beneficiary directly and as soon as possible. You
   agree to fully cooperate with any request we make for evidence we deem
   necessary to verify your compliance with these Terms of Service.

   The following are examples of Content and/or use that is illegal or
   prohibited by GoFundMe. This list is not exhaustive and we reserve the
   right to investigate anyone who, in our sole discretion, violates any
   of the terms or spirit of these Terms of Service. We further reserve
   without limitation, the right to remove the offending Content, suspend
   or terminate the account of such violators, stop payments to any such
   Campaign, freeze or place a hold on Donations, and report you to law
   enforcement authorities or otherwise take appropriate legal action
   including seeking restitution on behalf of ourselves and/or our users.
   Without limiting the foregoing, you agree not to use the Services to:
    A. raise funds or establish or contribute to any Campaign with the
       implicit or explicit purpose of or involving:
         1. violating any law, regulation, industry requirement, or
            third-party guidelines or agreements by which you are bound,
            including those of payment card providers and transaction
            processors that you utilize in connection with the Services;
         2. any election campaigns that are not run by a registered
            organization within the supported country;
         3. content or campaigns that are fraudulent, misleading,
            inaccurate, dishonest, or impossible;
         4. drugs, narcotics, steroids, controlled substances,
            pharmaceuticals or similar products or therapies that are
            either illegal, prohibited, or enjoined by an applicable
            regulatory body; legal substances that provide the same effect
            as an illegal drug; or other products, medical practices, or
            any related equipment or paraphernalia that have been found by
            an applicable regulatory body to cause consumer harm;
         5. knives, explosives, ammunition, firearms, or other weaponry or
            accessories;
         6. annuities, investments, equity or lottery contracts, lay-away
            systems, off-shore banking or similar transactions, money
            service businesses (including currency exchanges, check
            cashing or the like), pyramid schemes, “get rich quick
            schemes” (i.e., Investment opportunities or other services
            that promise high rewards), network marketing and referral
            marketing programs, debt collection or crypto-currencies;
         7. gambling, gaming and/or any other activity with an entry fee
            and a prize, including, but not limited to casino games,
            sports betting, fantasy sports, horse or greyhound racing,
            lottery tickets, raffle tickets, auctions and other ventures
            that facilitate gambling, games of skill or chance (whether or
            not it is legally defined as a lottery), promotions involving
            monetary rewards, including gift cards, or sweepstakes;
         8. campaigns we deem, in our sole discretion, to be in support
            of, or for the legal defense of alleged crimes associated with
            hate, violence, harassment, bullying, discrimination,
            terrorism, or intolerance of any kind relating to race,
            ethnicity, national origin, religious affiliation, sexual
            orientation, sex, gender or gender identity, or serious
            disabilities or diseases;
         9. activities with, in, or involving countries, regions,
            governments, persons, or entities that are subject to U.S. and
            other economic sanctions under applicable law, unless such
            activities are expressly authorized by the appropriate
            governmental authority;
        10. funding a ransom, human trafficking or exploitation,
            vigilantism, bribes or bounty;
        11. pornography or other sexual content;
        12. offensive, graphic, perverse or sensitive content;
        13. the sale of items before the seller has control or possession
            of the item;
        14. collecting payments on behalf of merchants by payment
            processors or otherwise; including but not limited to
            self-payments on campaigns or an attempt to bypass or
            otherwise circumvent the designated method of payment as
            provided by GoFundMe;
        15. credit repair or debt settlement services;
        16. the receipt or grant of cash advances or lines of credit to
            yourself or to another person for purposes other than those
            purposes clearly stated in the Campaign;
        17. publication or removal of content (such as mug shots), where
            the primary purpose of posting such content is to cause or
            raise concerns of reputational harm;
        18. sale or resale of a service without added benefit to the
            buyer; resale of government offerings without authorization or
            added value;
        19. aggregation of funds owed to third parties, factoring, or
            other activities intended to obfuscate the origin of funds;
        20. counterfeit music, movies, software, or other licensed
            materials without the appropriate authorization from the
            rights holder;
        21. products or services that directly infringe or facilitate
            infringement upon the trademark, patent, copyright, trade
            secrets, or proprietary or privacy rights of any third party;
        22. unauthorized sale or resale of brand name or designer products
            or services;
        23. sale of goods or services that are illegally imported or
            exported;
        24. processing where there is no bona fide donation accepted; cash
            advance; card testing; evasion of card network chargeback
            monitoring programs;
        25. collecting or providing funds for any purpose other than as
            described in a Campaign description;
        26. any other activity that GoFundMe may deem in its sole
            discretion to be in support of individuals and/or entities
            associated with alleged financial crimes including but not
            limited to corruption, bribery, tax evasion, fraud, and
            activities of a similar nature; or
        27. any other activity that GoFundMe may deem in its sole
            discretion to be unacceptable.
    B. transmit or otherwise upload any content that (i) infringes any
       intellectual property or other proprietary rights of any party;
       (ii) you do not have a right to upload under any law or under
       contractual or fiduciary relationships; (iii) contains software
       viruses or any other computer code, files or programs designed to
       interrupt, destroy or limit the functionality of any computer
       software or hardware or telecommunications equipment; (iv) poses or
       creates a privacy or security risk to any person; (v) constitutes
       unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials,
       commercial activities and/or sales, "junk mail," "spam," "chain
       letters," "pyramid schemes," "contests," "sweepstakes," or any
       other form of solicitation; or (vi) in the sole judgment of
       GoFundMe, is objectionable or which restricts or inhibits any other
       person from using or enjoying the Services, or which may expose
       GoFundMe or its users to any harm or liability of any type; or
    C. interfere with or disrupt servers or networks connected to the
       Services, or disobey any requirements, procedures, policies or
       regulations of networks connected to the Services; or
    D. harvest or collect email addresses or other contact information of
       other users from the Services by electronic or other means.
    E. raise funds for a minor without the express permission of the
       minor’s guardian unless the funds are transferred into a trust
       account for the sole benefit of the minor.

   Additionally, with respect to all Donations you make or accept through
   the Services, you agree:
     * not to make or accept any donations that you know or suspect to be
       erroneous, suspicious or fraudulent;
     * not to use the Services in or for the benefit of a country,
       organization, entity, or person embargoed or blocked by any
       government, including those on sanctions lists identified by the
       United States Office of Foreign Asset Control (OFAC);
     * to maintain reasonable and standard security measures to protect
       any information transmitted and received through the Services,
       including without limitation by adhering to any security procedures
       and controls required by GoFundMe from time to time;
     * to maintain a copy of all electronic and other records related to
       Campaigns and Donations as necessary for GoFundMe to verify
       compliance with these Terms of Service and make such records
       available to GoFundMe upon our request. For clarity, the foregoing
       does not affect or limit your obligations to maintain documentation
       as required by applicable laws, rules, regulations, or governmental
       authority; and
     * at GoFundMe’s request, including without limitation in case of
       investigations by GoFundMe, a payment processing partner, or a
       regulatory or governmental authority, fully cooperate in the
       auditing of such records, investigation of the relevant
       circumstances and remedy of any uncovered violation or wrongdoing.

   GoFundMe reserves the right to refuse, condition, or suspend any
   Donations or other transactions that we believe in our sole discretion
   may violate the Terms of Service or harm the interests of our users,
   business partners, the public, or GoFundMe, or that expose you,
   GoFundMe, or others to risks unacceptable to us. We may share any
   information related to your use of the Services with the appropriate
   financial institution, regulatory authority, or law enforcement agency
   consistent with our legal obligations. This information may include
   information about you, your account, your Donors, your Donations, and
   transactions made through or in connection with your use of the
   Services.

   Donations: In order to contribute to a Campaign or to a Charity, a
   Donor will be required to provide GoFundMe information regarding its
   credit card or other payment instrument (“Payment Instrument”) that is
   linked to the Donor’s account on the Services (a “Billing Account”).
   You, as a Donor, represent and warrant to GoFundMe that such
   information is true and that you are authorized to use the applicable
   Payment Instrument. You agree that a certain minimum Donation amount
   may apply, and that all Donation payments are final and will not be
   refunded unless GoFundMe, in its sole discretion, agrees to issue a
   refund, for example in accordance with the GoFundMe Guarantee. GoFundMe
   uses third-party payment processing partners to bill you through your
   Payment Instrument and Billing Account for any Donations made, and
   Donors acknowledge that by contributing a Donation to a Campaign, the
   Donor is agreeing to any and all applicable terms set forth by our
   payment partners (currently, WePay, Inc., Stripe, Inc., Adyen LLC,
   PayPal, Inc., and our charity partner, PayPal Giving Fund), in addition
   to these Terms of Service, including WePay’s terms of service, Stripe’s
   terms of service, Adyen’s terms of service, PayPal’s terms of service,
   and PayPal Giving Fund’s terms of service. GoFundMe’s payment partner
   in Australia is Adyen Australia. Adyen Australia contracts with
   GoFundMe’s Australian entity, GoFundMe Australia Pty Ltd (ACN 627 702
   630), which entity is the contracting party responsible for
   transactions benefitting the Australian user.

   Recurring Donations: Donors may have the option to contribute recurring
   period Donations (your agreement to make the Donations on a recurring
   basis, a “Donation Subscription” and each individual Donation made in
   connection with a Donation Subscription, a “Donation Installment”), and
   in electing to contribute on a recurring basis, you, as a Donor hereby
   acknowledge that Donation Subscriptions automatically renew and have a
   recurring payment feature, and that unless and until you opt out of the
   auto-renewal of the Donation Subscription, which can be done through
   the Platform, any Donation Subscriptions you have signed up for will be
   automatically extended for successive renewal periods of the same
   duration as the initial term originally selected. In connection with
   each of your Donation Subscriptions, you (i) hereby authorize GoFundMe
   to bill your Payment Instrument in the amount of the applicable
   Donation Installments in advance on a periodic basis until you
   terminate such periodic payments by opting out of the Donation
   Subscription, (ii) accept responsibility for payment of all Donation
   Installments occurring prior to opt out and (iii) agree to promptly
   update your Billing Account with any changes (for example, any changes
   related to your Payment Instrument, such as a change in your billing
   address or credit card expiration date). Changes to or termination of
   Donation Subscriptions or Donation Installments will apply only to
   Donation Installments that take place after GoFundMe receives notice of
   such change or termination. GoFundMe does not provide refunds of any
   amounts received in connection with previously made Donation
   Installments. Additionally, by enrolling in any Donation Subscriptions,
   you acknowledge and agree for any and all such Donation Subscriptions,
   that (a) the ongoing maintenance and operation of Donation
   Subscriptions and each Donation Installment are the sole responsibility
   of, and subject to the sole discretion of, the individual or entity
   responsible for managing and receiving the Donation Subscription (e.g.,
   the applicable Campaign Organizer or Charity), (b) individual Donation
   Installments may not be tax deductible, even if previous Donation
   Installments for the same Donation Subscription were, and the amount of
   each Donation Installment that is tax deductible may vary, (c) one or
   more specific Donation Installment may not be provided to or received
   by the applicable cause, charity or Campaign if such cause, charity or
   Campaign becomes unavailable, unable to accept Donations, or chooses to
   stop receiving Donations, which may occur for various reasons, such as
   if the cause, charity or Campaign becomes subject to an investigation
   or is suspended or removed from the Services by GoFundMe or (d) the
   amounts actually received by the applicable Campaign, Charity or cause
   may differ from one Donation Installment to the next (for example, if
   the transaction fees associated with the Donation Installment change).

   Your non-termination of a Donation Subscription reaffirms that GoFundMe
   is authorized to charge your Payment Instrument for the Donation
   Subscription in accordance with these terms. This does not waive our
   right to seek payment directly from you.

   Account Holds: From time to time, GoFundMe may (in our sole discretion)
   place a hold on a Campaign account (a "Hold"), restricting Withdrawals
   (defined herein) by a Campaign Organizer. Some of the reasons that we
   may place a Hold on a Campaign Account include the following: (i) if we
   have reason to believe (in our sole discretion) that information
   provided by a Campaign Organizer is false, misleading, or fraudulent,
   or that funds are being used in a prohibited manner, (ii) if the funds
   available (as determined by GoFundMe in its sole discretion) should be
   provided directly to a person other than the Campaign Organizer (such
   as a legal beneficiary or person entitled by law to act on behalf of a
   Campaign Organizer), (iii) if we have reason to believe that a Campaign
   or Campaign Organizer has violated these Terms of Service, (iv) if
   GoFundMe determines that the Campaign Organizer is colluding with
   donors to engage in fraudulent activity, (v) if we have reason to
   believe (in our sole discretion) that there may be suspicious or
   fraudulent donation activity, or (vi) if required in order to comply
   with a court order, subpoena, writ, injunction, or as otherwise
   required under applicable laws and regulations. If you have questions
   about a Hold we may have placed on your Campaign account, or need
   information about how to resolve the Hold, please contact us at
   support@gofundme.com.

   Rewards: Reward Levels are not intended to be items available for
   purchase and GoFundMe does not guarantee the delivery of Reward Levels
   in any way.

   Withdrawing Donations from a Campaign: While GoFundMe strives to make
   Withdrawals available to you promptly, you acknowledge and agree that
   Withdrawals may not be available to you for use immediately, and
   GoFundMe does not guarantee that Withdrawals will be available to you
   within any specific time frame, and GoFundMe expressly disclaims any
   and all responsibility for any delay or inability to access and use
   Withdrawals at any specified time, and any consequences arising from
   such delay or inability. You, as a Campaign Organizer, are responsible
   for ensuring that the information you provide to GoFundMe in order to
   process a Withdrawal, including your bank account information, is
   accurate and up to date. GoFundMe may, at any time, for any reason,
   without notice, and in its sole discretion, offer or issue a refund of
   Donation(s) with or without consulting with you, which may comprise the
   entire amount donated to your campaign. GoFundMe is not liable to you
   or to any third party for any claims, damages, costs, losses, or other
   consequences caused by GoFundMe issuing refunds, including, but not
   limited to transaction or overdraft fees.

   Special Notice for International Use; Export Controls: Software
   (defined below) available in connection with the Services and the
   transmission of applicable data, if any, may be subject to export
   controls and economic sanctions laws of the United States or other
   jurisdictions. No Software may be downloaded from the Services or
   otherwise exported or re-exported in violation of such export control
   and economic sanctions laws. Downloading or using the Software is at
   your sole risk. Recognizing the global nature of the Internet, you
   agree to comply with all local rules and laws regarding your use of the
   Services, including as it concerns online conduct and acceptable
   content.
   Apple-Enabled Software Applications

   GoFundMe offers Software applications that are intended to be operated
   in connection with products made commercially available by Apple Inc.
   ("Apple"), among other platforms. With respect to Software that is made
   available for your use in connection with an Apple-branded product
   (such Software, "Apple-Enabled Software"), in addition to the other
   terms and conditions set forth in these Terms of Service, the following
   terms and conditions apply:
     * GoFundMe and you acknowledge that these Terms of Service are
       concluded between GoFundMe and you only, and not with Apple, and
       that as between GoFundMe and Apple, GoFundMe, not Apple, is solely
       responsible for the Apple-Enabled Software and the content thereof.
     * You may not use the Apple-Enabled Software in any manner that is in
       violation of or inconsistent with the Usage Rules set forth for
       Apple-Enabled Software in, or otherwise be in conflict with, the
       App Store Terms of Service.
     * Your license to use the Apple-Enabled Software is limited to a
       non-transferable license to use the Apple-Enabled Software on an
       iOS Product that you own or control, as permitted by the Usage
       Rules set forth in the App Store Terms of Service.
     * Apple has no obligation whatsoever to provide any maintenance or
       support services with respect to the Apple-Enabled Software.
     * Apple is not responsible for any product warranties, whether
       express or implied by law. In the event of any failure of the
       Apple-Enabled Software to conform to any applicable warranty, you
       may notify Apple, and Apple will refund the purchase price for the
       Apple-Enabled Software to you, if any; and, to the maximum extent
       permitted by applicable law, Apple will have no other warranty
       obligation whatsoever with respect to the Apple-Enabled Software,
       or any other claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs or
       expenses attributable to any failure to conform to any warranty,
       which will be GoFundMe's sole responsibility, to the extent it
       cannot be disclaimed under applicable law.
     * GoFundMe and you acknowledge that GoFundMe, not Apple, is
       responsible for addressing any claims of you or any third party
       relating to the Apple-Enabled Software or your possession and/or
       use of that Apple-Enabled Software, including, but not limited to:
       (i) product liability claims; (ii) any claim that the Apple-Enabled
       Software fails to conform to any applicable legal or regulatory
       requirement; and (iii) claims arising under consumer protection or
       similar legislation.
     * In the event of any third party claim that the Apple-Enabled
       Software or the end-user's possession and use of that Apple-Enabled
       Software infringes that third party's intellectual property rights,
       as between GoFundMe and Apple, GoFundMe, not Apple, will be solely
       responsible for the investigation, defense, settlement and
       discharge of any such intellectual property infringement claim.
     * You represent and warrant that (i) you are not located in a country
       that is subject to a U.S. Government embargo, or that has been
       designated by the U.S. Government as a "terrorist supporting"
       country; (ii) you are not listed on any U.S. Government list of
       prohibited or restricted parties and (iii) you are not located in
       any other country or jurisdiction from which you would be barred
       from using the Services by applicable law.
     * If you have any questions, complaints or claims with respect to the
       Apple-Enabled Software, they should be directed to GoFundMe as
       follows:
       support@gofundme.com
       855 Jefferson Ave PO Box 1329
       Redwood City, CA 94063

   GoFundMe and you acknowledge and agree that Apple, and Apple's
   subsidiaries, are third-party beneficiaries of these Terms of Service
   with respect to the Apple-Enabled Software, and that, upon your
   acceptance of the terms and conditions of these Terms of Service, Apple
   will have the right (and will be deemed to have accepted the right) to
   enforce these Terms of Service against you with respect to the
   Apple-Enabled Software as a third-party beneficiary thereof.
   Accordingly, the parties acknowledge and agree that GoFundMe enters
   into this clause (“Apple-Enabled Software Applications”) for its own
   benefit and on its own behalf and also as an agent for the benefit and
   on behalf of Apple and its subsidiaries with respect to the exercise
   and enforcement of all rights, benefits and remedies of Apple and its
   subsidiaries (but not any obligation or burden) in this clause
   (“Apple-Enabled Software Applications”) which rights, benefits and
   remedies shall be enforceable by GoFundMe in its own right and also as
   agent for and on behalf of each of Apple and its subsidiaries. GoFundMe
   may amend, terminate or rescind these Terms of Service without the
   consent of Apple or any such subsidiary.
   Intellectual Property Rights

   Services Content, Software and Trademarks: You acknowledge and agree
   that the Services may contain content or features ("Services Content")
   that are protected by copyright, patent, trademark, trade secret or
   other proprietary rights and laws. Except as expressly authorized by
   GoFundMe, you agree not to modify, copy, frame, scrape, rent, lease,
   loan, sell, distribute or create derivative works based on the Services
   or the Services Content, in whole or in part, except that the foregoing
   does not apply to your own User Content (as defined below) that you
   legally upload to the Services. In connection with your use of the
   Services you will not engage in or use any data mining, robots,
   scraping or similar data gathering or extraction methods. If you are
   blocked by GoFundMe from accessing the Services (including by blocking
   your IP address), you agree not to implement any measures to circumvent
   such blocking (e.g., by masking your IP address or using a proxy IP
   address). Any use of the Services or the Services Content other than as
   specifically authorized herein is strictly prohibited. The technology
   and software underlying the Services or distributed in connection
   therewith are the property of GoFundMe, our affiliates and our partners
   (the "Software"). You agree not to copy, modify, create a derivative
   work of, reverse engineer, reverse assemble or otherwise attempt to
   discover any source code, sell, assign, sublicense, or otherwise
   transfer any right in the Software. Any rights not expressly granted
   herein are reserved by GoFundMe.

   The GoFundMe name and logos are trademarks and service marks of
   GoFundMe (collectively the "GoFundMe Trademarks"). Other company,
   product, and service names and logos used and displayed via the
   Services may be trademarks or service marks of their respective owners,
   who may or may not endorse or be affiliated with or connected to
   GoFundMe. Nothing in these Terms of Service or the Services should be
   construed as granting, by implication, estoppel, or otherwise, any
   license or right to use any of GoFundMe Trademarks displayed on the
   Services, without our prior written permission in each instance. All
   goodwill generated from the use of GoFundMe Trademarks will inure to
   our exclusive benefit.

   Third-Party Material: Under no circumstances will GoFundMe be liable in
   any way for any content or materials of any third parties (including
   users and Campaign Organizers) or any User Content (defined below,
   including, but not limited to, for any errors or omissions in any
   content, or for any loss or damage of any kind incurred as a result of
   the use of any such content. You acknowledge that GoFundMe does not
   pre-screen content, but that GoFundMe and its designees will have the
   right (but not the obligation) in their sole discretion to refuse,
   remove, or allow any content that is available via the Services at any
   time and for any reason, with or without notice, and without any
   liability to you or to any third party for any claims, damages, costs
   or losses resulting therefrom.

   User Content Transmitted Through the Services: With respect to the
   content, photos, videos, images, trademarks, logos, brands or other
   materials you upload or post through the Services or share with other
   users or recipients (collectively, "User Content"), you represent and
   warrant that you own all right, title and interest in and to, or
   otherwise have all necessary rights and consents to (and to allow
   others to) fully exploit, such User Content, including, without
   limitation, as it concerns all copyrights, trademark rights and rights
   of publicity or privacy related thereto. By uploading, sharing,
   providing, or otherwise making available any User Content, or any
   portion thereof, in connection with the Services, you hereby grant and
   will grant GoFundMe and its affiliated companies and users a
   nonexclusive, worldwide, royalty free, fully paid up, transferable,
   sublicensable, perpetual, irrevocable license to copy, display, upload,
   perform, distribute, store, modify and otherwise use your User Content
   in connection with the operation of the Services or the promotion,
   advertising or marketing thereof, in any form, medium or technology now
   known or later developed. Without limiting the foregoing, if any User
   Content contains your name, image or likeness, you hereby release and
   hold harmless GoFundMe and its contractors and employees, from (i) all
   claims for invasion of privacy, publicity or libel, (ii) any liability
   or other claims by virtue of any blurring, distortion, alteration,
   optical illusion, or other use or exploitation of your name, image or
   likeness, and (iii) any liability for claims made by you (or any
   successor to any claim you might bring) in connection with your User
   Content, name, image or likeness. You waive any right to inspect or
   approve any intermediary version(s) or finished version(s) of the
   results of the use of your User Content (including your name, image or
   likeness). Further, if any person (other than you) appears in your User
   Content, you represent and warrant that you have secured all necessary
   licenses, waivers and releases from such person(s) for the benefit of
   GoFundMe in a manner fully consistent with the licenses, waivers and
   releases set forth above. You further acknowledge that your
   participation in the Services and submission of User Content is
   voluntary and that you will not receive financial compensation of any
   type associated with the licenses, waivers, and releases set forth
   herein (or GoFundMe's exploitation thereof), and that the sole
   consideration for subject matter of this agreement is the opportunity
   to use the Services.

   We do not guarantee that any Services Content will be made available
   through the Services. We reserve the right to, but do not have any
   obligation to, (i) remove, edit or modify any Services Content or User
   Content, in our sole discretion, at any time, without notice to you and
   for any reason (including, but not limited to, upon receipt of claims
   or allegations from third parties or authorities relating to such
   Services Content or User Content, or if we are concerned that you may
   have violated these Terms of Service), or for no reason at all and (ii)
   to remove or block any Services Content or User Content from the
   Services.

   You acknowledge and agree that any questions, comments, suggestions,
   ideas, feedback or other information about the Services
   ("Submissions"), provided by you to GoFundMe are non-confidential and
   GoFundMe will be entitled to the unrestricted use and dissemination of
   these Submissions for any purpose, commercial or otherwise, without
   acknowledgment or compensation to you.

   You acknowledge and agree that GoFundMe may preserve content and may
   also disclose content if required to do so by law or in the good-faith
   belief that such preservation or disclosure is reasonably necessary to
   (a) comply with legal process, applicable laws or government requests;
   (b) enforce these Terms of Service; (c) respond to claims that any
   content violates the rights of third parties; or (d) protect the
   rights, property, or personal safety of GoFundMe, its users or the
   public.

   Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard: The Payment Card Industry
   Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) is a set of industry-mandated
   requirements for any business that handles, processes, or stores credit
   cards. The primary purpose of the standards is to maintain controls
   around cardholder data to reduce credit card fraud. As a service
   provider, GoFundMe is PCI DSS compliant and will maintain all
   applicable PCI DSS requirements to the extent that we possess or
   otherwise store, process, or transmit cardholder data on behalf of you,
   or to the extent that we can in any way impact the security of your
   cardholder data environment.

   Copyright Complaints: GoFundMe respects the intellectual property of
   others, and we ask our users to do the same. If you believe that your
   work has been copied in a way that constitutes copyright infringement,
   or that your intellectual property rights have been otherwise violated,
   you should notify GoFundMe of your infringement claim in accordance
   with the procedure set forth below.

   GoFundMe will process and investigate notices of alleged infringement
   and will take appropriate actions under the Digital Millennium
   Copyright Act ("DMCA") and other applicable intellectual property laws
   with respect to any alleged or actual infringement. A notification of
   claimed copyright infringement should be emailed to GoFundMe's
   Copyright Agent at support@gofundme.com (Subject line: "DMCA Takedown
   Request"). You may also contact us by mail or facsimile at:

   GoFundMe Copyright Agent:
   GoFundMe, Inc.
   Attn: Legal
   855 Jefferson Ave PO Box 1329
   Redwood City, CA 94063

   To be effective, the notification must be in writing and contain the
   following information:
     * an electronic or physical signature of the person authorized to act
       on behalf of the owner of the copyright or other intellectual
       property interest;
     * a description of the copyrighted work or other intellectual
       property that you claim has been infringed;
     * a description of where the material that you claim is infringing is
       located on the Services, with enough detail that we may find it on
       the Services;
     * your address, telephone number, and email address;
     * a statement by you that you have a good faith belief that the
       disputed use is not authorized by the copyright or intellectual
       property owner, its agent, or the law; and
     * a statement by you, made under penalty of perjury, that the above
       information in your notice is accurate and that you are the
       copyright or intellectual property owner or authorized to act on
       the copyright or intellectual property owner's behalf.

   Counter-Notice: If you believe that your User Content that was removed
   (or to which access was disabled) is not infringing, or that you have
   the authorization from the copyright owner, the copyright owner's
   agent, or pursuant to the law, to upload and use the content in your
   User Content, you may send a written counter-notice containing the
   following information to the above-listed Copyright Agent:
     * your physical or electronic signature;
     * identification of the content that has been removed or to which
       access has been disabled and the location at which the content
       appeared before it was removed or disabled;
     * a statement that you have a good-faith belief that the content was
       removed or disabled as a result of mistake or a misidentification
       of the content; and
     * your name, address, telephone number, and email address, and a
       statement that you will accept service of process from the person
       who provided notification of the alleged infringement.

   If a counter-notice is received by the Copyright Agent, GoFundMe will
   send a copy of the counter-notice to the original complaining party,
   informing that person that it may replace the removed content or cease
   disabling it in 10 business days. Unless the copyright owner files an
   action seeking a court order against the content provider, member or
   user, the removed content may be replaced, or access to it restored, in
   10 to 14 business days or more after receipt of the counter-notice, at
   our sole discretion.

   Repeat Infringer Policy: In accordance with the DMCA and other
   applicable law, GoFundMe has adopted a policy of terminating, in
   appropriate circumstances and at GoFundMe's sole discretion, users who
   are deemed to be repeat infringers. GoFundMe may also at its sole
   discretion limit access to the Services and/or terminate the
   memberships of any users who infringe any intellectual property rights
   of others, whether or not there is any repeat infringement.
   Third Party Websites/Services

   The Services or third parties may provide or facilitate links, tools,
   widgets or other features that allow you to access other sites,
   services and resources provided by third parties (collectively, “Third
   Party Resources”). GoFundMe has no control over such Third Party
   Resources or any products, services or content made available through
   or by such Third Party Resources, or the business practices of the
   third parties providing such Third Party Resources, and GoFundMe is not
   responsible for and does not endorse such Third Party Resources or the
   products, services or content made available thereby. You acknowledge
   that GoFundMe is not responsible or liable for the content, functions,
   accuracy, legality, appropriateness or any other aspect of such Third
   Party Resources. You further acknowledge and agree that GoFundMe will
   not be responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or
   loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with use of or
   reliance on any content, events, goods or services available on or
   through any such Third Party Resources. Any dealings you have with
   third parties found while using the Services are between you and the
   third party and may be subject to additional terms provided by the
   third party, which you agree to by using such Third Party Resources,
   and you agree that GoFundMe is not liable for any loss or claim that
   you may have against any such third party.
   Indemnity and Release

   You agree to release, indemnify on demand and hold GoFundMe and its
   affiliates and their officers, employees, directors and agents harmless
   from any and all losses, damages, expenses, including reasonable
   attorneys' fees, costs, awards, fines, damages, rights, claims, actions
   of any kind and injury (including death) arising out of or relating to
   your use of the Services, any Donation or Campaign, any User Content,
   your connection to the Services, your violation of these Terms of
   Service or your violation of any rights of another. You agree that
   GoFundMe has the right to conduct its own defense of any claims at its
   own discretion, and that you will indemnify GoFundMe for the costs of
   its defense (including, but not limited to attorney’s fees.) If you are
   a California resident, you waive California Civil Code Section 1542,
   which says: "A general release does not extend to claims which the
   creditor does not know or suspect to exist in his favor at the time of
   executing the release, which if known by him must have materially
   affected his settlement with the debtor." If you are a resident of
   another jurisdiction—in or outside of the United States—you waive any
   comparable statute or doctrine.
   Disclaimer of Warranties

   YOUR USE OF THE SERVICES IS AT YOUR SOLE RISK. THE SERVICES ARE
   PROVIDED ON AN "AS IS" AND "AS AVAILABLE" BASIS. GOFUNDME AND ITS
   AFFILIATES EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM AND EXCLUDE, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT
   PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ALL WARRANTIES, CONDITIONS AND
   REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY,
   INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF
   MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE AND
   NON-INFRINGEMENT.

   GOFUNDME AND ITS AFFILIATES MAKE NO WARRANTY OR CONDITION THAT (I) THE
   SERVICES WILL MEET YOUR REQUIREMENTS, (II) THE SERVICES WILL BE
   UNINTERRUPTED, TIMELY, SECURE, OR ERROR-FREE, (III) THE RESULTS THAT
   MAY BE OBTAINED FROM THE USE OF THE SERVICES WILL BE ACCURATE OR
   RELIABLE, OR (IV) THE QUALITY OF ANY PRODUCTS, SERVICES, INFORMATION,
   OR OTHER MATERIAL PURCHASED OR OBTAINED BY YOU THROUGH THE SERVICES
   WILL MEET YOUR EXPECTATIONS.
   Limitation of Liability

   YOU EXPRESSLY UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT
   PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, NEITHER GOFUNDME NOR ITS AFFILIATES WILL
   BE LIABLE FOR ANY (A) INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, CONSEQUENTIAL,
   PUNITIVE OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, (B) DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, (C)
   DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF GOODWILL, (D) DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF USE, (E) LOSS OR
   CORRUPTION OF DATA, OR (F) OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF GOFUNDME
   HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), WHETHER BASED ON
   CONTRACT, TORT, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY OR OTHERWISE, RESULTING
   FROM (I) THE USE OR THE INABILITY TO USE THE SERVICES; (II) THE COST OF
   PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS AND SERVICES RESULTING FROM ANY GOODS,
   DATA, INFORMATION OR SERVICES PURCHASED OR OBTAINED OR MESSAGES
   RECEIVED OR TRANSACTIONS ENTERED INTO THROUGH OR FROM THE SERVICES;
   (III) ANY PROMOTIONS AND RELATED PRIZES OR REWARDS MADE AVAILABLE
   THROUGH THE SERVICES; (IV) UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO OR ALTERATION OF YOUR
   TRANSMISSIONS OR DATA; (V) STATEMENTS OR CONDUCT OF ANY THIRD PARTY ON
   THE SERVICES; OR (VI) ANY OTHER MATTER RELATING TO THE SERVICES. TO THE
   FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN NO EVENT WILL GOFUNDME'S
   TOTAL LIABILITY TO YOU FOR ALL DAMAGES, LOSSES (INCLUDING CONTRACT,
   NEGLIGENCE, STATUTORY LIABILITY OR OTHERWISE) OR CAUSES OF ACTION
   EXCEED THE AMOUNT YOU HAVE PAID GOFUNDME IN THE LAST SIX (6) MONTHS,
   OR, IF GREATER, ONE HUNDRED DOLLARS ($100).

   SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES OR
   THE LIMITATION OR EXCLUSION OF LIABILITY FOR INCIDENTAL OR
   CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES. ACCORDINGLY, SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH
   ABOVE MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU. IF YOU ARE DISSATISFIED WITH ANY PORTION OF
   THE SERVICES OR WITH THESE TERMS OF SERVICE, YOUR SOLE AND EXCLUSIVE
   REMEDY IS TO DISCONTINUE USE OF THE SERVICES.
   DISPUTES

   ARBITRATION CLAUSE & CLASS ACTION WAIVER – IMPORTANT – PLEASE REVIEW AS
   THIS AFFECTS YOUR LEGAL RIGHTS

   Arbitration; Class Action Waiver. YOU AGREE THAT ALL DISPUTES BETWEEN
   YOU AND US OR ANY OF OUR OFFICERS, DIRECTORS OR EMPLOYEES ACTING IN
   THEIR CAPACITY AS SUCH (WHETHER OR NOT SUCH DISPUTE INVOLVES A THIRD
   PARTY) WITH REGARD TO YOUR RELATIONSHIP WITH US, INCLUDING WITHOUT
   LIMITATION DISPUTES RELATED TO THESE TERMS OF SERVICE, YOUR USE OF THE
   SERVICES, AND/OR RIGHTS OF PRIVACY AND/OR PUBLICITY, WILL BE RESOLVED
   BY BINDING, INDIVIDUAL ARBITRATION AND YOU AND WE HEREBY EXPRESSLY
   WAIVE TRIAL BY JURY. DISCOVERY AND RIGHTS TO APPEAL IN ARBITRATION ARE
   GENERALLY MORE LIMITED THAN IN A LAWSUIT, AND OTHER RIGHTS THAT YOU AND
   WE WOULD HAVE IN COURT MAY NOT BE AVAILABLE IN ARBITRATION. YOU
   UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT, BY ENTERING INTO THESE TERMS, YOU AND WE ARE
   EACH WAIVING OUR RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY OR TO PARTICIPATE IN A CLASS
   ACTION.

   Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in these Terms of Service will
   be deemed to waive, preclude, or otherwise limit the right of either of
   us to (a) bring an individual action in small claims court; (b) pursue
   an enforcement action through the applicable federal, state, or local
   agency if that action is available; (c) seek injunctive relief in a
   court of law; or (d) file suit in a court of law to address an
   intellectual property infringement claim.

   The Process. Any arbitration between you and us will be settled under
   the Federal Arbitration Act and administered by the American
   Arbitration Association (“AAA”) under its Consumer Arbitration Rules
   (collectively, “AAA Rules”) as modified by these Terms of Service. The
   AAA Rules and filing forms are available online at www.adr.org by
   calling the AAA at 1-800-778-7879.

   A party who intends to seek arbitration must first send a written
   notice of the dispute to the other party by certified U.S. Mail or by
   Federal Express (signature required) or, only if that other party has
   not provided a current physical address, then by electronic mail
   (“Notice of Arbitration”). Our current address for Notice is: GoFundMe,
   Inc. 855 Jefferson Avenue, Redwood City, CA 94063. The Notice of
   Arbitration must: (a) describe the nature and basis of the claim or
   dispute; and (b) set forth the specific relief sought (“Demand”). We
   agree to work with you and make a good faith effort to resolve the
   claim directly, but if we aren’t successful within 60 days after the
   Notice of Arbitration is received, you or we may commence an
   arbitration proceeding. All arbitration proceedings between the parties
   will be confidential unless otherwise agreed by the parties in writing.
   During the arbitration, the amount of any settlement offer made by
   either of us must not be disclosed to the arbitrator until after the
   arbitrator makes a final decision and award, if any. If the arbitrator
   awards you an amount which exceeds the last written settlement amount
   offered by us in settlement of the dispute prior to the award, we will
   pay to you the higher of: (i) the amount awarded by the arbitrator; or
   (ii) $10,000.00.

   Fees. If you commence arbitration in accordance with these Terms of
   Service, we will reimburse you for your payment of the filing fee
   unless your claim is for more than $10,000 in which case the payment of
   any fees will be decided by the AAA Rules. Any arbitration hearing will
   take place at an agreed upon location in San Francisco, California, but
   if the claim is for $10,000 or less, you may choose whether the
   arbitration will be conducted: (a) solely on the basis of documents
   submitted to the arbitrator; (b) through a telephone hearing or (c) by
   an in-person hearing as established by the AAA Rules in the county of
   your billing address. If the arbitration finds that either the
   substance of your claim or the relief sought in the Demand is frivolous
   or brought for an improper purpose (as measured by the standards set
   forth in the Federal Rule of Civil procedure 11(b), then the payment of
   all fees will be governed by the AAA Rules. In that case, you agree to
   reimburse us for all monies previously disbursed by us that are
   otherwise your obligation to pay under the AAA Rules. Regardless of the
   manner in which the arbitration is conducted, the arbitrator must issue
   a reasoned written decision sufficient to explain the essential
   findings and conclusions on which the decision and award, if any, are
   based. The arbitrator may make rulings and resolve disputes as to the
   payment and reimbursement of fees or expenses at any time during the
   proceeding and upon request from either party made within 14 days of
   the arbitrator’s ruling on the merits.
     * No Class Actions. YOU AND WE AGREE THAT EACH MAY BRING CLAIMS TO
       THE FULLEST EXTENT LEGALLY PERMISSIBLE AGAINST THE OTHER ONLY IN
       YOUR OR ITS INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY AND NOT AS A PLAINTIFF OR CLASS
       MEMBER IN ANY PURPORTED CLASS OR REPRESENTATIVE PROCEEDING.
       Further, unless both you and we agree otherwise, the arbitrator may
       not consolidate more than one person’s claims and may not otherwise
       preside over any form of a representative or class proceeding.
     * Modifications to this Arbitration Provision. If we make any future
       change to this arbitration provision, other than a change to our
       address for Notice of Arbitration, you may reject the change by
       sending us written notice within 30 days of the change to our
       address for Notice of Arbitration, in which case your account with
       us will be immediately terminated and this arbitration provision,
       as in effect immediately prior to the changes you rejected will
       survive.
     * Enforceability. If this Disputes section is found to be
       unenforceable, then the entirety of this Disputes section will be
       null and void and, in that case, the parties agree that the
       exclusive jurisdiction and venue described in the General section
       below will govern any action arising out of or related to these
       Terms of Service.

   Confidentiality. We each agree to keep the arbitration proceedings, all
   information exchanged between us, and any settlement offers
   confidential, unless otherwise required by law or requested by law
   enforcement or any court or governmental body. However, we may each
   disclose these matters, in confidence, to our respective accountants,
   auditors, and insurance providers.
   Termination

   You agree that GoFundMe, in its sole discretion, may suspend or
   terminate your account (or any part thereof) or your access to the
   Services and remove and discard any content or data at any time and for
   any reason, with or without notice, and without any liability to you or
   to any third party for any claims, damages, costs or losses resulting
   therefrom.
   User Disputes

   You agree that you are solely responsible for your interactions with
   any other user in connection with the Services and GoFundMe will have
   no liability or responsibility with respect thereto. GoFundMe reserves
   the right, but has no obligation, to become involved in any way with
   disputes between you and any other user of the Services.
   General

   These Terms of Service constitute the entire agreement between you and
   GoFundMe and govern your use of the Services, superseding any prior
   agreements between you and GoFundMe with respect to the Services. You
   also may be subject to additional terms and conditions that may apply
   when you use affiliate or third-party services, third-party content or
   third-party software. These Terms of Service will be governed by the
   laws of the State of California without regard to its conflict of law
   provisions. With respect to any disputes or claims not subject to
   arbitration, as set forth above, you and GoFundMe agree to submit to
   the personal and exclusive jurisdiction of the state and federal courts
   located within San Mateo County, California. The failure of GoFundMe to
   exercise or enforce any right or provision of these Terms of Service
   will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. If any
   provision of these Terms of Service is found by a court of competent
   jurisdiction to be (or are otherwise) invalid, the parties nevertheless
   agree that the court should endeavor to give effect to the parties’
   intentions as reflected in the provision, and the other provisions of
   these Terms of Service remain in full force and effect. You agree that
   regardless of any statute or law to the contrary, any claim or cause of
   action arising out of or related to use of the Services or these Terms
   of Service must be filed within one (1) year after such claim or cause
   of action arose or be forever barred. A printed version of this
   agreement and of any notice given in electronic form will be admissible
   in judicial or administrative proceedings based upon or relating to
   this agreement to the same extent and subject to the same conditions as
   other business documents and records originally generated and
   maintained in printed form. You may not assign these Terms of Service
   without the prior written consent of GoFundMe, but GoFundMe may assign
   or transfer these Terms of Service, in whole or in part, without
   restriction. If we fail to enforce any of our rights, that does not
   result in a waiver of that right. The section titles in these Terms of
   Service are for convenience only and have no legal or contractual
   effect. Notices to you may be made via either email or regular mail.
   The Services may also provide notices to you of changes to these Terms
   of Service or other matters by displaying notices or links to notices
   generally on the Platform.
   Privacy Policy

   At GoFundMe, we respect the privacy of our users. For details please
   see our Privacy Policy. By using the Services, you consent to our
   collection and use of personal data as outlined therein. If you are in
   Europe, by using the Services, you acknowledge GoFundMe's collection
   and use of personal information as described in the Privacy Policy.
   Questions? Concerns? Suggestions?

   Please contact us at support@gofundme.com to report any violations of
   these Terms of Service or to pose any questions regarding these Terms
   of Service or the Services.

Common Questions

   Learn more about GoFundMe and how it can help you fundraise.
   Learn More

Download the App

   Our native Android and iOS apps unlock GoFundMe's full potential!
   Available on the App Store
   Get it on Google Play

Why GoFundMe?

     * Mobile-Friendly Campaigns
     * No penalties for missing goal
     * GoFundMe Mobile App

     * No deadlines or goal requirements
     * Expert advice, 24/7
     * Keep every donation you receive

   Start a GoFundMe

#1 Fundraising platform

   People have raised more money on GoFundMe than anywhere else.
   How it works

GoFundMe Guarantee

   Your donation is protected. If anything is not right, we’ll give you a
   full refund.
   Learn more

GoFundMe app

   Our Android and iOS apps make it easy to fundraise on-the-go.
   Download
     * Get Started
          + How It Works
          + Why GoFundMe
          + Common Questions
          + Success Stories
          + Sign Up Now
     * Top Categories
          + Medical Fundraising
          + Memorial Fundraising
          + Charity Fundraising
     * Learn More
          + About Us
          + GoFundMe Stories
          + Press
          + Campaign Tips
          + We're Hiring!
     * Get Support
          + Help Center
          + Supported Countries & Currencies
          + Blog

   [English (US)]
   Get Started
     * How It Works
     * Why GoFundMe
     * Common Questions
     * Success Stories
     * Sign Up Now

   Top Categories
     * Medical Fundraising
     * Memorial Fundraising
     * Charity Fundraising

   Learn More
     * About Us
     * GoFundMe Stories
     * Press
     * Campaign Tips
     * We're Hiring!

   Get Support
     * Help Center
     * Supported Countries & Currencies
     * Blog

     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal

   © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     *
     *
     *
     *

     * © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal

     *
     *
     *
     *
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.google-analytics.com/gtm/ns?id=GTM-KJFLHK

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TDTFTZ

   GoFundMe (BUTTON)

   Raise money for any cause
   Start a GoFundMe
     * Home
     * Sign up
     * How it works
     * Help
     * Sign in

     * ____________________

     * Start a GoFundMe

   (BUTTON)
   ____________________

     Try searching for locations, campaign titles and names
     * Explore Category
     * Medical
       Medical
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Surgery Financial Help
          + Gender Confirmation Surgery Guide
          + Medical Campaigns
          + Cancer
          + Breast Cancer
          + IVF
     * Volunteer
       Volunteer
       View All
          + Volunteer Campaigns
     * Emergencies
       Emergencies
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Paying for Hurricanes, Storms, Floods, Fires
          + Emergencies Campaigns
     * Education
       Education
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Fundraising Ideas for School Clubs
          + Education Campaigns
          + Extracurriculars
          + College Tuition
          + Classroom
     * Memorials
       Memorials
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + How to Set up a Memorial Fund
          + Funeral & Memorial Costs Guide
          + Memorials Campaigns
     * Sports
       Sports
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Raising Money for Cheerleading & Dance
          + Sports Campaigns
     * Animals
       Animals
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Saving Money on Vet Bills
          + Pet Fundraising: 5 Tips
          + Animals Campaigns
     * Wishes
       Wishes
       View All
          + Wishes Campaigns
     * Competitions
       Competitions
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Guide to Beauty Pageants on a Budget
          + Competitions Campaigns
     * Other
       Other
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Financial Help for Veterans
          + Other Campaigns
     * Newlyweds
       Newlyweds
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Saving Money on Weddings
          + Newlyweds Campaigns
     * Charity
       Charity
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Helping a Charity Fundraise
          + Charity Campaigns
     * Faith
       Faith
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Fundraising for Your Church
          + Faith Campaigns
     * Travel
       Travel
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + How to Deal with Travel Costs
          + Travel Campaigns
     * Creative
       Creative
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + 5 Tips to Make Money as an Artist
          + Creative Campaigns
     * Community
       Community
       View All
          + Community Campaigns
     * Events
       Events
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Event Planning on a Budget
          + Events Campaigns
     * Business
       Business
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Guide to Saving Local Businesses, Restaurants & Stores
          + Business Campaigns
     * Family
       Family
       View All
          + Family Campaigns

Privacy Policy

Questions about our privacy policy? Contact Us

   Date of Last Revision: September 12, 2018.

   Welcome to the web site or mobile application (as the case may be)
   (collectively, the "Platform") of GoFundMe, Inc. (including its
   subsidiaries, affiliates, agents, and service providers, collectively,
   "GoFundMe," "we," "us," and/or "our"). This Platform is operated by
   GoFundMe and has been created to provide information about our company,
   our online platform designed to permit users to post a fundraising
   campaign to accept monetary donations, and our related services
   (together with the Platform, the "Services") to our Services users and
   visitors ("you," and/or "your"). Except as provided below, this Privacy
   Policy describes and governs how we collect, use, share and protect
   data collected from users of or visitors to the Platform.

   Before you use or submit any information through or in connection with
   the Services, please carefully review this Privacy Policy. By using any
   part of the Services, you consent to the collection, use, and
   disclosure of your information as further outlined in this Privacy
   Policy.

   If you are in Europe:

     * for the purposes of the EU General Data Protection Regulation
       2016/679 (the "GDPR"), the data controller is GoFundMe, Inc. and
       can be reached at the address set out at "Contacting GoFundMe"
       below;
     * "information" covers all personal data processed by us which means
       information that (either in isolation or in combination with other
       information) enables you to be identified directly or indirectly;
       and
     * you will not need to consent to this Privacy Policy, but do
       acknowledge you have read and understood its terms.

   Information We Collect

   As further described below, when you use or otherwise access the
   Services, we may collect information in multiple ways, including when
   you provide information directly to us, and when we passively collect
   information from your browser or device.
    A. Information That You Provide Directly to Us:
       We collect information from you (including, but not limited to,
       your name, email address, and location) when you voluntarily
       provide such information, such as when you contact us with
       inquiries, respond to one of our surveys, provide us with feedback,
       register for access to the Services, or use certain Services.
       You may also provide us with information relating to third
       parties—including information stored in your email and mobile
       device address books—such as, without limitation, names, email
       addresses, and phone numbers of your contacts (collectively,
       “Third-Party Data”). The Services may request your permission to
       access such Third-Party Data.
       You may also provide us with special categories of personal data
       under the GDPR (also known as sensitive data) about yourself and/or
       third parties, such as health information. When you provide such
       information, we will seek your explicit consent unless it is being
       published in relation to your campaign.
       We collect this information for the purposes described below in the
       section entitled, Our Use of Information Collected. While you are
       under no obligation to directly provide us with such information,
       should you choose to withhold such information, we may not be able
       to provide you with some or all of the Services.
       If you provide “personal data” (as defined under the Privacy Shield
       principles – See Privacy Shield section for more information on how
       we treat information from users who reside in the European Union,
       European Economic Area, and Switzerland) to the Services, you
       acknowledge and agree that such personal data may be transferred
       from your current location to the offices and servers of GoFundMe
       and the authorized third parties referred to herein located in the
       United States.
       Our Services may include online chats and message boards. Please
       remember that any information that is disclosed in these areas
       becomes public information for both us and other users to use and
       share. Please be considerate and respectful of others while using
       the community to share your opinions. We reserve the right, but do
       not have the obligation, to review and monitor such posting or any
       other content on our Services, and to remove postings or content
       that may be viewed as inappropriate or offensive to others.
    B. Information That is Passively or Automatically Collected
         I. Device & Usage Information:
            When you interact with GoFundMe through the Services, we
            automatically receive and store certain information from
            devices that you use to access the Services. This information
            is collected passively using various technologies, and
            includes the type of internet browser or mobile device you
            use, any website from which you have come to the Services,
            your operating system, and may include location data through
            an IP address that identifies the city and state where you
            logged into the Platform or your precise geo-location if you
            have permitted your mobile device to provide that information
            to us. GoFundMe may store such information itself or such
            information may be included in databases owned and maintained
            by GoFundMe affiliates, agents or service providers.
        II. Aggregated Data:
            In an ongoing effort to better understand and serve the users
            of the Services, GoFundMe often conducts research on its
            customer demographics, interests and behavior based on
            information we collect. We may de-identify and/or aggregate
            the information collected through the Services for research
            purposes or any other purposes, and we may share this data
            with our affiliates, agents, business partners, or other third
            parties.
        III. Location Information:
            When you use the Services to organize a fundraising campaign,
            the Services may request that you provide your city or town
            and state or province of residence. Please keep in mind that
            other users of the Services may be able to view your city or
            town and state or province of residence in connection with the
            campaign, if it is made available within GoFundMe's Public
            Search Directory. We may also use your location information in
            an aggregate way, as described above in the "Aggregated Data"
            section.
        IV. Cookies and Other Electronic Technologies:
            When you interact with the Services, we try to make that
            experience simple and meaningful. When you visit our Platform,
            our web server sends a cookie to your computer or mobile
            device. Cookies are small pieces of information that are
            issued to your computer or mobile device when you visit a
            website or access or use a mobile application, and that store
            and sometimes track information about your use of the
            Platform. A number of cookies we use last only for the
            duration of your web or application session and expire when
            you close your browser or exit the application. Other cookies
            are used to remember you when you return to the Platform and
            will last longer.
            Some of the cookies used by the Platform are set by us, and
            some are set by third parties who are delivering services on
            our behalf.
            We may use cookies, and similar technologies to cookies, to
            collect information about your access and use of the Platform.
            For example, we may use cookies or other technologies that:
            (1) allow you to navigate and use all the features provided by
            our Platform; (2) customize elements of the layout and/or
            content within the Platform and remember that you have visited
            us before; (3) identify the number of unique visitors we
            receive; (4) allow us to provide you with a customized
            experience; and (5) inform us how you use the Platform
            (including how long you spend on the Platform) and where you
            have come to the Platform from, so that we can improve the
            Platform and learn which functions of the Platform are most
            popular with users. As we adopt additional technologies, we
            may also gather additional information through other methods.
            Most web and mobile device browsers automatically accept
            cookies but, if you prefer, you can change your browser to
            prevent that or to notify you each time a cookie is set. You
            can also learn more about cookies by visiting
            www.allaboutcookies.org, which includes additional useful
            information on cookies and how to block cookies using
            different types of browsers or mobile devices.
            You may also consult the "Help" section of your browser for
            more information (e.g., Internet Explorer; Google Chrome;
            Mozilla Firefox; or Apple Safari). You can also manage the use
            of Flash technologies, including cookies and local storage
            objects with the Flash management tools available at Adobe's
            website. Please note that by blocking any or all cookies, you
            may not have access to certain features or offerings of the
            Services.
            If you are accessing our Services through a mobile device, you
            can also update your privacy settings on your device by
            setting the “Limit Ad Tracking” and Diagnostics and Usage
            setting property located in the settings screen of your Apple
            iPhone or iPad, or by resetting your Android ID through apps
            that are available in the Play Store. You can also limit
            information collection by uninstalling the App on your device
            and you can use the standard uninstall process available as
            part of your device for this purpose.
    C. Information From Social Networking Services
       One of the special features of the Services is that it may allow
       you to enable or log into the Services via various social
       networking services like Facebook or Twitter ("Social Networking
       Service(s)"). By directly integrating these services, we aim to
       make your online experiences richer and more personalized. To take
       advantage of this feature, we will ask you to provide your
       credentials for the applicable Social Networking Service in order
       to log-in to our Services. When you add a Social Networking
       Services account to the Services or log into the Services using
       your Social Networking Services account, we will collect relevant
       information necessary to enable the Services to access that Social
       Networking Service and your data contained within that Social
       Networking Service. As part of such integration, the Social
       Networking Service will provide us with access to certain
       information (including, for example, your name and photograph, as
       well as other information that you permit the Social Network
       Service to share with us) that you have provided to the Social
       Networking Service, and we will use, store, and disclose such
       information in accordance with this Privacy Policy. However, please
       remember that the manner in which Social Networking Services use,
       store, and disclose your information is governed by the policies of
       such third parties, and GoFundMe shall have no liability or
       responsibility for the privacy practices or other actions of any
       Social Networking Services that may be enabled within the Services.
       You may also have the option of posting your Services activities to
       Social Networking Services when you access content through the
       Services (for example, you may post to Facebook that you performed
       an activity on the Platform); you acknowledge that if you choose to
       use this feature, your friends, followers, and subscribers on any
       Social Networking Services you have enabled will be able to view
       such activity.
       Please visit the privacy policy of the relevant Social Networking
       Service to find out more information about your rights and choices.

   Our Use of Information Collected

   GoFundMe uses the information collected from the Services in a manner
   that is consistent with this Privacy Policy. If you start a campaign,
   we may reach out to you to provide helpful tips or advice in connection
   with your campaign. If you provide information for a certain reason, we
   may use the information in connection with the reason for which it was
   provided. For instance, if you contact us by email, we will use the
   information you provide to answer your question or resolve your
   problem. Also, if you provide information about yourself, or have
   provided (or otherwise permitted the Services to access) any
   Third-Party Data, we will use your information and any such Third-Party
   Data to provide you with access to such services and to monitor your
   use of such services. For the purposes of the GDPR, we may use your
   information in the above ways as this is necessary for us to fulfill
   our obligations under our contract with you or in order to take steps
   at your request prior to entering into a contract.

   GoFundMe may also use the information we collect through the Services
   to help us in providing the Services and support services, processing
   transactions, fulfilling requests for information, receiving and
   sending communications, updating marketing lists, analyzing data and
   research aimed at improving the accuracy, effectiveness, usability or
   popularity of the Services, to personalize the content and advertising
   that you see on Services and to understand how users interact with and
   user our advertisement and Services, to associate your activities,
   customize content or tailor advertising across different device and
   browsers that you use to access the Services (for instance, computers,
   tablets, mobile devices, applications and websites), to comply with
   state, local, federal or international laws, to enforce our Terms of
   Service and this Privacy Policy, as otherwise described in this Privacy
   Policy, or in assisting with other tasks from time to time. Please note
   that we may combine information that we collect from you and about you
   (including automatically-collected information) with information we
   obtain about you from our affiliates and/or non-affiliated third
   parties, and use such combined information in accordance with this
   Privacy Policy. For the purposes of the GDPR, we may use your
   information in the above ways as this is necessary: (i) to fulfill our
   obligations under our contract with you or in order to take steps at
   your request prior to entering into a contract; (ii) for our legitimate
   interest to maintain our relationship with you or protect you and us
   against fraud; or (iv) to comply with legal obligations.

   We may also use the information collected from the “Information We
   Collect” section, such as device identifiers and MAC addresses, to
   associate users’ activities, customize content, or tailor advertising
   to those users across different devices and browsers (for instance,
   tablets, mobile devices and applications, and websites). For the
   purposes of the GDPR, we may use your information in the above ways as
   this is necessary: (i) to fulfil our obligations under our contract
   with you or in order to take steps at your request prior to entering
   into a contract; (ii) for our legitimate interest to maintain our
   relationship with you or protect you and us against fraud; or (iv) to
   comply with legal obligations.

   GoFundMe may use the information collected through the Services to
   contact you about services we believe will be of interest to you. In
   some cases, we will seek your permission. In each marketing
   communication we send you will contain instructions permitting you to
   "opt-out" of receiving future marketing communications. In addition, if
   at any time you wish not to receive any future marketing communications
   or you wish to have your name deleted from our mailing lists, please
   contact us as indicated below. If you opt out of receiving marketing
   communications or other information we think may interest you, as
   discussed below, we may still send you emails about your account or any
   Services you have requested or received from us.

   We may also use data collected through the Services to send
   communications relating to the Services, in accordance with applicable
   laws. For example, we may send periodic emails to registered users of
   the Services relating to their recent interactions with the Services,
   such as donating to a campaign or "hearting" a campaign. Also, if you
   use any feature of the Services permitting you to communicate with
   third parties (such as to refer a third party to the Services or to
   communicate with them regarding a campaign or a donation), either by
   submitting Third-Party Data to the Services or otherwise permitting the
   Services to automatically access Third-Party Data in your possession,
   you acknowledge and agree that you have the authority of the relevant
   third party for us to access and use the relevant Third-Party Data and
   that you have notified these third parties and informed them how their
   information is collected and used by GoFundMe to provide the Services.
   We reserve the right to identify you as the person who has made the
   referral in any messages that are sent to them. We may use Third-Party
   Data to (1) contact such third party using the Third-Party Data
   provided, and/or (2) provide you with an editable template message
   designed to facilitate communication between you and such third party
   through the Services. In addition to sending the foregoing
   communications, we may also send reminders or related messages to you
   and to third parties on your behalf from time to time where permitted
   by applicable law. In each case, any such communications sent to third
   parties using Third-Party Data will provide a means to "opt-out" of
   receiving further communication of the same nature.

   Mobile Services: If you access the Services through a mobile device,
   you agree that we may communicate with you regarding GoFundMe by SMS,
   MMS, text message, or other electronic means to your mobile device. In
   the event you change or deactivate your mobile telephone number, you
   agree to promptly update your GoFundMe account information to ensure
   that your messages are not misdirected. Please note that your wireless
   service carrier’s standard charges, data rates, and other fees may
   apply where you access the Services through a mobile device. In
   addition, downloading, installing, or using certain Services on a
   mobile device may be prohibited or restricted by your carrier, and not
   all Services may work with all carriers or devices. By using the
   Services on a mobile device, you agree that we may communicate with you
   regarding GoFundMe by SMS, MMS, text message, or other electronic means
   to your mobile device. In the event you change or deactivate your
   mobile telephone number, you agree to promptly update your GoFundMe
   account information to ensure that your messages are not misdirected.
   Our Disclosure of Information Collected Through the Services

   There are certain circumstances in which we may share information
   collected through the Services with certain third parties without
   further notice to you, as set forth below:
    A. Business Transfers:
       As we develop our business, we might sell or buy businesses or
       assets. In the event of a corporate sale, merger, reorganization,
       dissolution, similar event, or steps taken in anticipation of such
       events (e.g., due diligence in a transaction), user information may
       be part of the transferred assets.
    B. Agents, Consultants, Vendors and Related Third Parties:
       GoFundMe, like many businesses, sometimes hires other companies to
       perform certain business-related functions on its behalf, and we
       may provide access to or share your information with these
       companies so they can perform services for us. Examples of such
       functions include marketing, mailing information, data storage,
       security, fraud preventions, payment processing, legal services,
       and maintaining databases. For example, if you are a donor in
       Australia, GoFundMe’s Australian entity, GoFundMe Australia Pty Ltd
       (ACN 627 702 630) contracts with Adyen Australia for payment
       processing. Adyen Australia, therefore, will collect, process and
       store your data on behalf of GoFundMe.
    C. Legal Requirements:
       GoFundMe may access, disclose, transfer and preserve your
       information when we have a good faith belief that doing so is
       necessary to: (i) comply with the law including with subpoenas,
       search warrants, court orders, and other legal process; and respond
       to inquiries or requests from government, regulatory, law
       enforcement, public authorities, or content protection
       organizations; (ii) protect and defend the legal rights, privacy,
       safety or property of GoFundMe, its affiliates, subsidiaries,
       employees, agents, contractors, or its users; (iii) permit us to
       pursue available remedies, commence, participate in, or defend
       litigation, or limit the damages we may sustain; or (iv) enforce
       this Privacy Policy or any applicable Terms of Service.
    D. Campaign Organizers
       If you donate to a fundraising campaign, we may share your name,
       email address and other information you’ve provided in connection
       with your donation with the campaign organizer, who may contact
       you. By donating to the campaign, you consent to our sharing the
       above information and to the campaign organizer contacting you.
    E. Your consent
       We may share your information in the event that you consent to the
       sharing of your information. For example, we may partner with third
       party organizations to arrange for specific campaigns. If you
       consent to our delivering your contact information to a specific
       partner, we may share, with the partner organization, your name,
       email address and other information you’ve provided in connection
       with your donation to the specific campaign.
    F. Aggregate and/or De-Identified Information
       We may aggregate and/or de-identify your information so that the
       information no longer relates to you individually. Our use and
       disclosures of such aggregated or de-identified information is not
       subject to this Privacy Policy, and may be disclosed to others
       without limitation and for any purpose.
    G. Analytics
       We may use third-party web analytics services on our Services, such
       as those of Google Analytics. These service providers use the sort
       of technology previously described in the “Cookies and other
       electronic technologies” section to help us analyze how users use
       the Services, including by noting the third-party website from
       which you arrive, and provide certain features to you. The
       information (including your IP address) collected by the technology
       will be disclosed to or collected directly by these service
       providers, who use the information to evaluate your use of the
       Services. This information may be used to place interest-based
       advertisements on the Platform. This may result in you seeing
       advertisements for our Platform when you visit other websites. To
       prevent Google Analytics from using your information for analytics,
       you may install the Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on by
       clicking here.

   Tailored Advertising

   We may use third-party advertising technologies that allow for the
   delivery of relevant content and advertising on our Platform, as well
   as on other websites you visit. The ads may be based on various factors
   such as the content of the page you are visiting, information you enter
   such as your age and gender, your searches, demographic data,
   user-generated content, and other information we collect from you.
   These ads may be based on your current activity or your activity over
   time and across other websites and online services and may be tailored
   to your interests.

   Also, third parties whose products or services are accessible or
   advertised on our Platform may place cookies or other tracking
   technologies on your computer, mobile phone, or other device to collect
   information about your use of the website as discussed above. We also
   allow other third parties (e.g., ad networks and ad servers such as
   Google Analytics, DoubleClick and others) to serve tailored ads to you
   on our website, other sites, and in other applications, and to access
   their own cookies or other tracking technologies on your computer,
   mobile phone, or other device you use to access the website. We may
   provide our customer information (such as a hashed version of your
   email addresses) to service providers, who may “match” this information
   in de-identified form to cookies (or mobile ad identifiers) and other
   proprietary IDs, in order to target or “retarget” you with ads when you
   visit other websites and mobile applications. (You may opt out of these
   many of these service providers as described in the next paragraph.)

   We neither have access to, nor does this Privacy Policy govern, the use
   of cookies or other tracking technologies that may be placed on your
   computer, mobile phone, or other device you use to access our website
   by non-affiliated, third-party ad technology, ad servers, ad networks
   or any other non-affiliated third parties. Those parties that use these
   technologies may offer you a way to opt out of ad targeting as
   described below.

   If you receive tailored advertising on your computer through a web
   browser, you can learn more about such tailored browser advertising and
   how you can generally control cookies from being put on your computer
   to deliver tailored advertising, by visiting the European Interactive
   Digital Advertising Alliance Consumer Ad Choices link for EU based
   advertising or for US based advertising either: (i) the Network
   Advertising Initiative’s Consumer Opt-Out link or (ii) the Digital
   Advertising Alliance’s Consumer Opt-Out link to opt-out of receiving
   tailored advertising from companies that participate in those programs.
   To opt out of Google Analytics for display advertising or customize
   Google display network ads, you can visit the Google Ads Settings page.

   Please note that to the extent advertising technology is integrated
   into our website or other websites that you visit, you may still
   receive advertisements even if you opt-out. In that case, the
   advertising will not be tailored to your interests. Also, we do not
   control any of the above opt-out links or whether any particular
   company chooses to participate in these opt-out programs. We are not
   responsible for any choices you make using these mechanisms or the
   continued availability or accuracy of these mechanisms.
   Unsolicited Information

   Please be advised that some information you provide may be publicly
   accessible, such as information posted in forums or comment sections.
   We may also collect information through customer support
   communications, your communication to us of ideas for new products or
   modifications to existing products, and other unsolicited submissions
   (collectively, with publicly-accessible information, "Unsolicited
   Information"). By sending us Unsolicited Information, you further (a)
   agree that we are under no obligation of confidentiality, express or
   implied, with respect to the Unsolicited Information, (b) acknowledge
   that we may have something similar to the Unsolicited Information
   already under consideration or in development, (c) grant us an
   irrevocable, non-exclusive, royalty-free, perpetual, worldwide license
   to use, modify, prepare derivative works, publish, distribute and
   sublicense the Unsolicited Information, and (iv) irrevocably waive, and
   cause to be waived, against GoFundMe and its users any claims and
   assertions of any moral rights contained in such Unsolicited
   Information. This Unsolicited Information section shall survive any
   termination of your account or the Services. This Privacy Policy
   otherwise does not apply to any information collected by GoFundMe other
   than information collected through the Services.
   Children

   Our Services are not designed for use by individuals under the age of
   13(or 16 in Europe). If you are under the age of 13(or 16 in Europe),
   please do not use the Services and/or submit any information through
   the Services. If you have reason to believe that a child under the age
   of 13(or 16 in Europe) has provided personal information to GoFundMe
   through the Services, please contact us support@gofundme.com, and we
   will delete that information from our databases to the extent required
   by law.
   Links to Other Web Sites

   This Privacy Policy applies only to the Services. The Services may
   contain links to other web sites not operated or controlled by GoFundMe
   (the "Third-Party Sites"). The policies and procedures we described
   here do not apply to the Third-Party Sites. The links from the Services
   do not imply that GoFundMe endorses or has reviewed the Third-Party
   Sites. We suggest contacting those sites directly for information on
   their respective privacy policies.
   Security

   GoFundMe has implemented technical and organizational security measures
   to protect the Personal Data provided via the Services from loss,
   misuse, and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, or
   destruction. For example, limiting access to information only to
   employees and authorized service providers who need to know such
   information for the purposes of this Privacy Notice. However, no
   Internet or email transmission is ever fully secure or error free. In
   particular, email sent to or from the Services may not be secure.
   Therefore, you should take special care in deciding what information
   you send to us via email. Please keep this in mind when disclosing any
   information to GoFundMe via the Internet.
   Do-Not-Track Signals

   Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in
   certain web browsers. We do not recognize or respond to
   browser-initiated DNT signals, as the Internet industry is currently
   still working toward defining exactly what DNT means, what it means to
   comply with DNT, and a common approach to responding to DNT. To learn
   more about Do Not Track, you can do so here.
   Retention of your information

   We will only retain the information for as long as necessary for the
   purpose for which that information was collected and to the extent
   permitted or required by applicable laws. When we no longer need to use
   your information, we will remove it from our systems and records and/or
   take step to anonymize it so that you can no longer be identified from
   it in accordance with our internal document retention policies.
   Access to Information

   You may access and correct certain information about you by visiting
   the “Account Settings” portion of our Platform. You may also request in
   writing copies of personal information about you held by us. If that
   information is inaccurate, please let us know and we will endeavor to
   make the necessary amendments, erase, or block the relevant information
   as you request. For more information on your rights if you are in
   Europe, please see the "Users in Europe” section below.
   Privacy Shield

   GoFundMe has certified with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield
   as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the
   collection, use, and retention of “personal data” (as defined under the
   Privacy Shield principles) from applicable European countries. GoFundMe
   has certified that it adheres to the Privacy Shield Principles of
   notice, choice, onward transfer, security, data integrity, access, and
   enforcement for such personal data. To learn more about the Privacy
   Shield Framework, visit the Department of Commerce’s Privacy Shield
   list by clicking here.

   As required under the principles, when GoFundMe receives information
   under the Privacy Shield and then transfers it to a third-party service
   provider acting as an agent on GoFundMe’s behalf, GoFundMe has certain
   liability under the Privacy Shield if both (i) the agent processes the
   information in a manner inconsistent with the Privacy Shield and (ii)
   GoFundMe is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.

   If you have any questions or complaints about GoFundMe’s privacy
   practices, including questions related to the Privacy Shield, you may
   contact us at the email address or mailing address set forth under
   “Contacting GoFundMe.” We will work with you to resolve your issue.

   If you are a resident of the European Union or Switzerland and are
   dissatisfied with the manner in which we have addressed your concerns
   about our privacy practices, you may seek further assistance, at no
   cost to you, from our designated Privacy Shield independent recourse
   mechanism, the JAMS Privacy Shield Program, which you can learn more
   about by visiting https://www.jamsadr.com/eu-us-privacy-shield.

   Residents of the European Union or Switzerland may elect to arbitrate
   unresolved complaints but prior to initiating such arbitration, you
   must: (1) contact GoFundMe and afford us the opportunity to resolve the
   issue; (2) seek assistance from GoFundMe’s designated independent
   recourse mechanism above; and (3) contact the U.S. Department of
   Commerce (either directly or through a European Data Protection
   Authority) and afford the Department of Commerce time to attempt to
   resolve the issue. Each party shall be responsible for its own
   attorney’s fees. Please be advised that, pursuant to the Privacy
   Shield, the arbitrator(s) may only impose individual-specific,
   non-monetary, equitable relief necessary to remedy any violation of the
   Privacy Shield Principles with respect to the individual. GoFundMe is
   subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal
   Trade Commission (FTC).
   Users in Europe

     * Access. You have the right to request a copy of the information we
       are processing about you.
     * Rectification. You have the right to have incomplete or inaccurate
       information that we process about you rectified.
     * Deletion. You have the right to request that we delete information
       that we process about you, except we are not obliged to do so if we
       need to retain such data in order to comply with a legal obligation
       or to establish, exercise or defend legal claims.
     * Restriction. You have the right to restrict our processing of your
       information where you believe such data to be inaccurate; our
       processing is unlawful; or that we no longer need to process such
       data for a particular purpose unless we are not able to delete the
       data due to a legal or other obligation or because you do not wish
       for us to delete it.
     * Portability. You have the right to obtain information we hold about
       you in a structured, electronic format, and to transmit such data
       to another data controller, where this is (a) information that you
       have provided to us, and (b) if we are processing that data solely
       on the basis of your consent or to perform a contract with you.
     * Objection. Where the legal basis for processing your information is
       our legitimate interest, you have the right to object to such
       processing on grounds relating to your particular situation. We
       will abide by your request unless we have compelling legitimate
       grounds for the processing which override your interests, or if we
       need to continue to process the data for the establishment,
       exercise or defence of a legal claim.
     * Withdrawing consent. If you have consented to our processing of
       your information, you have the right to withdraw your consent at
       any time, free of charge. This includes where you wish to opt out
       from marketing messages.

   You can make a request to exercise any of these rights in relation to
   your information by sending the request to us at the email address or
   mailing address set forth under "Contacting GoFundMe". For your own
   privacy and security, at our discretion, we may require you to provide
   your identity before providing the requested information. Please note
   that GoFundMe may take up to 30 days to fulfill such requests.

   You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the local data
   protection authority if you believe that we have not complied with
   applicable data protection laws. A list of local data protection
   authorities in European countries is available here.
   Other Terms and Conditions

   Your access to and use of the Services is subject to the Terms of
   Service at https://fr.gofundme.com/terms and such other terms, which
   may be made available to you in connection with your use of the
   Services.
   Changes to GoFundMe's Privacy Policy

   The Services and our business may change from time to time. As a
   result, at times it may be necessary for GoFundMe to make changes to
   this Privacy Policy. GoFundMe reserves the right to update or modify
   this Privacy Policy at any time and from time to time. If you disagree
   with our revisions to the Privacy Policy, you may de-activate your
   account or discontinue the use of our Services. Please review this
   policy periodically, and especially before you provide us with any
   information through the Services. This Privacy Policy was last updated
   on the date indicated above. Your continued use of the Services after
   any changes or revisions to this Privacy Policy shall indicate your
   agreement with the terms of such revised Privacy Policy.

   If you are in Europe, you will not be required to agree to changes to
   this Privacy Policy, unless we specifically seek your consent.
   Contacting GoFundMe

   Please also feel free to contact us if you have any questions about
   GoFundMe's Privacy Policy or the information practices of the Services.

   You may contact us as follows:

   Legal Department
   855 Jefferson Avenue
   P.O. Box 1329
   Redwood City, CA 94063

   support@gofundme.com

   For the purposes of the GDPR, you may contact our Data Protection
   Officer: legal@gofundme.com.

Common Questions

   Learn more about GoFundMe and how it can help you fundraise.
   Learn More

Download the App

   Our native Android and iOS apps unlock GoFundMe's full potential!
   Available on the App Store
   Get it on Google Play

Why GoFundMe?

     * Mobile-Friendly Campaigns
     * No penalties for missing goal
     * GoFundMe Mobile App

     * No deadlines or goal requirements
     * Expert advice, 24/7
     * Keep every donation you receive

   Start a GoFundMe

#1 Fundraising platform

   People have raised more money on GoFundMe than anywhere else.
   How it works

GoFundMe Guarantee

   Your donation is protected. If anything is not right, we’ll give you a
   full refund.
   Learn more

GoFundMe app

   Our Android and iOS apps make it easy to fundraise on-the-go.
   Download
     * Get Started
          + How It Works
          + Why GoFundMe
          + Common Questions
          + Success Stories
          + Sign Up Now
     * Top Categories
          + Medical Fundraising
          + Memorial Fundraising
          + Charity Fundraising
     * Learn More
          + About Us
          + GoFundMe Stories
          + Press
          + Campaign Tips
          + We're Hiring!
     * Get Support
          + Help Center
          + Supported Countries & Currencies
          + Blog

   [English (US)]
   Get Started
     * How It Works
     * Why GoFundMe
     * Common Questions
     * Success Stories
     * Sign Up Now

   Top Categories
     * Medical Fundraising
     * Memorial Fundraising
     * Charity Fundraising

   Learn More
     * About Us
     * GoFundMe Stories
     * Press
     * Campaign Tips
     * We're Hiring!

   Get Support
     * Help Center
     * Supported Countries & Currencies
     * Blog

     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal

   © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     *
     *
     *
     *

     * © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal

     *
     *
     *
     *
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.google-analytics.com/gtm/ns?id=GTM-KJFLHK

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TDTFTZ

     * (BUTTON) Search
     * (BUTTON) Discover
          + Fundraisers
          + Success Stories
     * (BUTTON) Fundraise for
          + Medical
          + Memorial
          + Emergency
          + Nonprofit
          + Education
          + See all

   (BUTTON)
   Search GoFundMe
   ____________________ (BUTTON)
   See all results for
     *

   (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON) How it works
          + How it works
            How GoFundMe works
            What is crowdfunding?
            Free fundraising
          + Plan your fundraiser
            Team fundraising
            Fundraising tips
            Fundraising ideas
     * Sign in
     * Start a GoFundMe

   (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON) Discover
          + Fundraisers
          + Success Stories
     * (BUTTON) Fundraise for
          + Medical
          + Memorial
          + Emergency
          + Nonprofit
          + Education
          + See all
     * (BUTTON) How it works
          + How GoFundMe works
          + What is crowdfunding?
          + Free fundraising
     * (BUTTON) Plan your fundraiser
          + Team fundraising
          + Fundraising tips
          + Fundraising ideas
     * Sign in
     * Start a GoFundMe

Free fundraising for the people and causes you care about

   Starting is easy. 0% platform fee*.
   Start a GoFundMe
   Paola raised over €136,000 to expand her wildlife sanctuary and save
   more animals in need.
   George’s family raised $8k for a new wheelchair to get him moving
   again.
   In 2017, the GoFundMe community raised millions of dollars for
   hurricane relief efforts. (Photo by The National Guard, CC, Adapted)
   The BFC Preussen team raised more than €1,200 for transportation to
   competitions.
   *Standard transaction fees apply to credit and debit card transactions
   Paola raised over €136,000 to expand her wildlife sanctuary and save
   more animals in need.
   George’s family raised $8k for a new wheelchair to get him moving
   again.
   In 2017, the GoFundMe community raised millions of dollars for
   hurricane relief efforts. (Photo by The National Guard, CC, Adapted)
   The BFC Preussen team raised more than €1,200 for transportation to
   competitions.

Free fundraising for the people and causes you care about

   Starting is easy. 0% platform fee*.
   Start a GoFundMe
   *Standard transaction fees apply to credit and debit card transactions

Start fundraising today

   More money raised online than anywhere else. Learn about how GoFundMe
   works.
   For yourself
   For a friend

   GoFundMe fundraising stories
   Fighting persecution abroad

   To help protect the vulnerable LGBT community in Chechnya, Guillaume
   and Benjamin raised €27,550 from more than 700 donors.
   GoFundMe fundraising stories
   Hope for a special needs child

   To help her autistic daughter cope with significant cognitive and
   social challenges, Justine raised €11,935 for behavioral therapy.
   GoFundMe fundraising stories
   A community to the rescue

   The mountaineering community raised €160,223 to rescue Elisabeth and to
   help the wife and children of her climbing partner Tomek, who lost his
   life on the mountain.

Over 10,000 people start a GoFundMe every day

   Medical
   Memorial
   Emergency
   Nonprofit
   Education
   Animals
   Business
   Community
   Competition
   Creative
   Event
   Faith
   Family
   Newlywed
   Sports
   Travel
   Volunteer
   Wishes
   Show all categories

Ready to start fundraising?

   Start a GoFundMe

   [English (US)]
   Fundraise for
     * Medical
     * Emergency
     * Memorial
     * Education
     * Charity
     * Nonprofit organization

   Learn more
     * How GoFundMe works
     * Why GoFundMe
     * Common questions
     * Success stories
     * Supported countries

   Resources
     * Help center
     * Blog
     * GoFundMe Stories
     * Press center
     * Careers
     * About

   © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.google-analytics.com/gtm/ns?id=GTM-KJFLHK

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TDTFTZ

   GoFundMe (BUTTON)

   Raise money for any cause
   Start a GoFundMe
     * Home
     * Sign up
     * How it works
     * Help
     * Sign in

     * ____________________

     * Start a GoFundMe

   (BUTTON)
   ____________________

     Try searching for locations, campaign titles and names
     * Explore Category
     * Medical
       Medical
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Surgery Financial Help
          + Gender Confirmation Surgery Guide
          + Medical Campaigns
          + Cancer
          + Breast Cancer
          + IVF
     * Volunteer
       Volunteer
       View All
          + Volunteer Campaigns
     * Emergencies
       Emergencies
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Paying for Hurricanes, Storms, Floods, Fires
          + Emergencies Campaigns
     * Education
       Education
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Fundraising Ideas for School Clubs
          + Education Campaigns
          + Extracurriculars
          + College Tuition
          + Classroom
     * Memorials
       Memorials
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + How to Set up a Memorial Fund
          + Funeral & Memorial Costs Guide
          + Memorials Campaigns
     * Sports
       Sports
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Raising Money for Cheerleading & Dance
          + Sports Campaigns
     * Animals
       Animals
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Saving Money on Vet Bills
          + Pet Fundraising: 5 Tips
          + Animals Campaigns
     * Wishes
       Wishes
       View All
          + Wishes Campaigns
     * Competitions
       Competitions
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Guide to Beauty Pageants on a Budget
          + Competitions Campaigns
     * Other
       Other
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Financial Help for Veterans
          + Other Campaigns
     * Newlyweds
       Newlyweds
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Saving Money on Weddings
          + Newlyweds Campaigns
     * Charity
       Charity
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Helping a Charity Fundraise
          + Charity Campaigns
     * Faith
       Faith
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Fundraising for Your Church
          + Faith Campaigns
     * Travel
       Travel
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + How to Deal with Travel Costs
          + Travel Campaigns
     * Creative
       Creative
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + 5 Tips to Make Money as an Artist
          + Creative Campaigns
     * Community
       Community
       View All
          + Community Campaigns
     * Events
       Events
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Event Planning on a Budget
          + Events Campaigns
     * Business
       Business
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Guide to Saving Local Businesses, Restaurants & Stores
          + Business Campaigns
     * Family
       Family
       View All
          + Family Campaigns

GoFundMe Terms & Conditions

Questions about our terms? Contact Us

   Date of Last Revision: May 20, 2019

   GoFundMe, Inc. provides its platform to you through its website and
   mobile applications (the "Platform") and related services
   (collectively, the Platform, including any new features and
   applications, the "Services"), subject to the following terms of
   service, as amended from time to time (the "Terms of Service"). If you
   are a campaign organizer (as defined below) or donor (a campaign
   organizer and a donor shall be collectively referred to herein as a
   “User”) located in the United States, you are contracting with
   GoFundMe, Inc., 855 Jefferson Avenue, Redwood City, CA, 94063. If you
   are a User located outside of the United States but not in Australia,
   you are contracting with GoFundMe Ireland, Ltd., 70 Sir John Rogersons
   Quay, Dublin 2. If you are a User located in Australia you are
   contracting with GoFundMe Australia PTY Ltd., Tower One – International
   Towers Sydney, Level 46, 100 Barangaroo Avenue, 2000, Sydney, NSW. For
   purposes of the following Terms of Service, “GoFundMe,” “we,” “us,”
   “our,” and other similar terms, shall refer to the party with whom you
   are contracting.

   ARBITRATION, JURY TRIAL, AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER: EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE
   DESCRIBED IN THE DISPUTES SECTION BELOW, BY USING THE SERVICES, YOU
   AGREE THAT DISPUTES BETWEEN US WILL BE RESOLVED BY BINDING, INDIVIDUAL
   ARBITRATION AND YOU WAIVE YOUR RIGHT TO A JURY TRIAL OR TO PARTICIPATE
   IN A CLASS ACTION. PLEASE REVIEW THE DISPUTES SECTION CAREFULLY; BY
   ENTERING THIS AGREEMENT, YOU EXPRESSLY ACKNOWLEDGE THAT YOU HAVE READ
   AND UNDERSTAND ALL OF THE TERMS OF THIS AGREEMENT.

   We reserve the right, at our sole discretion, to change or modify
   portions of these Terms of Service at any time. When we do this, we
   will post the revised Terms of Service on this page and will indicate
   the date of such revision.

   Your continued use of the Services after the date of any such changes
   constitutes your acceptance of the new Terms of Service. To the extent
   allowed by law, the English version of these Terms of Service is
   binding and other translations are for convenience only. If you do not
   wish to accept the new Terms of Service, you may discontinue your use
   of the Services.

   In addition, when using the Services, and unless you are in Europe, you
   will be subject to additional applicable policies including without
   limitation, the Privacy Policy located at
   https://fr.gofundme.com/privacy. All such terms are hereby incorporated
   by reference into these Terms of Service (provided, however, these
   Terms of Service will take precedence in the event of conflict). We
   shall resolve any such conflicts in our sole discretion, and all of our
   determinations are final.
   Access and Use of the Services

   Services Description: The Services are offered as a platform to allow
   an individual (the "Campaign Organizer") to post a fundraising campaign
   ("Campaign") to the Platform to accept monetary donations ("Donations")
   from donors ("Donors").

   Although there are no fees to set up a Campaign, industry-standard
   transaction fees apply (hereinafter and on the website referred to as
   "Transaction Fees") to the Services rendered to Campaign Organizers. To
   learn more about GoFundMe’s Platform and applicable Transaction Fees,
   visit https://www.gofundme.com/why-gofundme.

   The Services are a platform; We are not a Broker, Financial
   Institution, Creditor or Charity: The Services are an administrative
   platform only. GoFundMe facilitates the Campaign of the Campaign
   Organizers and permits Donors to make donations to these Campaign
   Organizers. GoFundMe is not a broker, agent, financial institution,
   creditor or 501(c)(3) nonprofit corporation (“Charity”)

   All information and content provided by GoFundMe relating to the
   Services is for informational purposes only, and GoFundMe does not
   guarantee the accuracy, completeness, timeliness or reliability of any
   such information or content. No content is intended to provide
   financial, legal, tax or other professional advice. Before making any
   decisions regarding any Campaigns, Charities, Donations, Donors, or any
   information or content relating to the Services, you should consult
   your financial, legal, tax or other professional advisor as
   appropriate. You acknowledge that all information and content accessed
   by you using the Services is at your own risk.

   GoFundMe has no control over the conduct of, or any information
   provided by, a Campaign Organizer, a Charity, or other user and hereby
   disclaims all liability in this regard to the fullest extent permitted
   by applicable law. We do not guarantee that a Campaign or a Charity
   will obtain a certain amount of Donations or any Donations at all. We
   do not endorse any Campaign, Campaign Organizer, or Charity, and we
   make no guarantee, express or implied, that any information provided
   through the Services is accurate. We expressly disclaim any liability
   or responsibility for the outcome or success of any Campaign. You, as a
   Donor, must make the final determination as to the value and
   appropriateness of contributing to any Campaign, Campaign Organizer, or
   Charity.

   All Donations are at your own risk. When you make a Donation through
   the Services, it is your responsibility to understand how your money
   will be used. GoFundMe is not responsible for any offers, promises,
   rewards or promotions made or offered by Charities, Campaigns or
   Campaign Organizers. We do not and cannot verify the information that
   Campaign Organizers supply, nor do we represent or guarantee that the
   Donations will be used in accordance with any fundraising purpose
   prescribed by a Campaign Organizer or Charity or in accordance with
   applicable laws. Notwithstanding the foregoing, we take possible
   fraudulent activity and the misuse of funds raised very seriously. You
   can learn more about our Fraud Policy at
   https://fr.gofundme.com/safety. If you have reason to believe that a
   Campaign Organizer or Charity is not raising or using the funds for
   their stated purpose, please use the "Report" button on the Campaign or
   Charity to alert our team of this potential issue and we will
   investigate. If you are a donor, you may also be covered by the
   GoFundMe Guarantee. Policy details are located at
   https://fr.gofundme.com/guarantee-refund-policy.

   You, as a Campaign Organizer, represent, warrant, and covenant that (i)
   all information you provide in connection with a Campaign is accurate,
   complete, and not likely to deceive reasonable Users; (ii) all
   Donations contributed to your Campaign will be used solely as described
   in the materials that you post or otherwise provide; (iii) you will not
   infringe the rights of others; (iv) you will comply with all relevant
   and applicable financial reporting obligations, including but not
   limited to laws and regulations relating to tax reporting, political
   contributions, and asset disclosures for your project; and (v) to the
   extent you share with us any personal data of any third party for any
   purpose, including the names, email addresses and phone numbers of your
   personal contacts, you have the authority (including any necessary
   consents), as required under applicable law, to provide us with such
   personal data and allow us to use such personal data for the purposes
   for which you shared it with us. You authorize GoFundMe, and GoFundMe
   reserves the right to, provide information relating to your Campaign to
   Donors, beneficiaries of your Campaign or law enforcement, and to
   assist in any investigation thereof.

   Your Registration Obligations: You may be required to register with
   GoFundMe in order to access and use certain features of the Services.
   If you choose to register for the Services, you agree to provide and
   maintain true, accurate, current and complete information about
   yourself as prompted by the Services' registration form. Campaign
   Organizers must register using their true identities, including their
   name and any image or video purporting to depict the Campaign Organizer
   or the beneficiary of such campaign. Registration data and certain
   other information about you are governed by our Privacy Policy. If you
   are under 13 years of age (16 in Europe), you are not authorized to use
   the Services, with or without registering. In addition, if you are
   under the age of majority in your jurisdiction (typically 18 or 19
   years of age), you may use the Services, with or without registering,
   only with the approval of your parent or guardian. Certain aspects of
   our Services may also require you to register with, and agree to the
   terms of, third-party service providers (e.g., payment processors),
   with whom GoFundMe has entered into contracts, in order to be able to
   benefit from their services. If GoFundMe or one of our payments
   processors at any time discovers that the information you provided
   about you or the purpose of your Campaign is incorrect or violates any
   of these Terms of Service or their terms of service, the Services may
   be suspended and/or terminated with immediate effect and fines may be
   applied by the relevant authorities which will in all such cases be
   payable by you. You acknowledge and agree that the use of third party
   payment processors are integral to the Services and that we may
   exchange information with such third parties in order to facilitate the
   provision of Services as set out in our Privacy Policy.

   Taxes: It is your responsibility to determine what, if any, taxes apply
   to the Donations you receive through your use of the Services. It is
   solely your responsibility to assess, collect, report or remit the
   correct tax, if any, to the appropriate tax authority.

   Member Account, Password and Security: You are responsible for
   maintaining the confidentiality of your password and account, if any,
   and are fully responsible for any and all activities that occur under
   your password or account. You agree to (a) immediately notify GoFundMe
   of any unauthorized use of your password or account or any other breach
   of security, and (b) sign out from your account at the end of each
   session when accessing the Services. GoFundMe will not be liable for
   any loss or damage arising from your failure to comply with this
   Section.

   Modifications to Services: GoFundMe reserves the right to modify,
   suspend or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, the Services (or
   any part thereof) at any time and for any reason, with or without
   notice, and without any liability to you or to any third party for any
   claims, damages, costs, or losses resulting therefrom.

   Public Content; Public Display of Donations: Some of your activity on
   and through the Services is public, such as content you post publicly
   on the website. Additionally, user profile information, including your
   first and last name, public email address, organization, personal
   biography, and other information you enter in connection with your user
   profile may be displayed to other users to facilitate user interaction
   within the Services. For example, as a Donor, you have the option to
   publicly display your Donation for all to see, including on search
   engines (like Google and Yahoo). To keep the details of your Donation
   private, simply click the "Private" checkbox during the Donation
   process. Please remember that if you choose to provide information
   using certain public features of the Services, then that information is
   governed by the privacy settings of those particular features and may
   be publicly available. Individuals reading such information may use or
   disclose it to other individuals or entities without our knowledge and
   without your knowledge, and search engines may index that information.
   We therefore urge you to think carefully about including any specific
   information you may deem private in content that you create or
   information that you submit through the Services. Please see our
   Privacy Policy for information on the ways that we may collect, use,
   and store certain information about you and your use of the Services.

   Promotions: You are not permitted to offer any contest, competition
   giveaway, sweepstakes or similar activity (each, a "Promotion") on or
   through the Services without our prior written consent which consent
   may be withheld in our sole and absolute discretion. You may seek
   permission by sending an email to promotions@gofundme.com.

   Data Retention You acknowledge that GoFundMe has no obligation to you
   to retain data relating to any account or campaign. You acknowledge
   that GoFundMe reserves the right to delete data or to terminate
   accounts or Campaigns at any time and for any reason, with or without
   notice, and without any liability to you or to any third party for any
   claims, damages, costs or losses resulting therefrom.

   Mobile Services: The Services include certain features that may be made
   available via a mobile device, including the ability to (i) upload
   content to the Platform, (ii) browse the Platform and (iii) access
   certain items through an application downloaded and installed on a
   mobile device (collectively, the "Mobile Services"). To the extent you
   access Mobile Services, your wireless service carrier's standard
   charges, data rates and other fees may apply. In addition, downloading,
   installing, or using certain Mobile Services may be prohibited or
   restricted by your carrier, and not all Mobile Services may work with
   all carriers or devices. By using the Mobile Services, you agree that
   we may communicate with you by SMS, MMS, text message or other
   electronic means to your mobile device and that certain information
   about your usage of the Mobile Services may be communicated to us. We
   shall comply with any additional requirements that may apply under
   local laws and regulations before communicating with you in this
   manner. In the event that you change or deactivate your mobile
   telephone number, you agree to promptly update your GoFundMe account
   information to ensure that your messages are not sent to the person
   that acquires your old number.
   Prohibited Conduct

   User Conduct: You are solely responsible for all Campaign descriptions,
   comments, videos, images, information, data, text, software, music,
   sound, photographs, graphics, messages or other materials (the
   "Content") that you upload, post, publish, display, transmit or
   otherwise use (hereinafter, "Upload") via the Services. If you are not
   the beneficiary of the Campaign you organize, you agree to deliver
   funds to the ultimate beneficiary directly and as soon as possible. You
   agree to fully cooperate with any request we make for evidence we deem
   necessary to verify your compliance with these Terms of Service.

   The following are examples of Content and/or use that is illegal or
   prohibited by GoFundMe. This list is not exhaustive and we reserve the
   right to investigate anyone who, in our sole discretion, violates any
   of the terms or spirit of these Terms of Service. We further reserve
   without limitation, the right to remove the offending Content, suspend
   or terminate the account of such violators, stop payments to any such
   Campaign, freeze or place a hold on Donations, and report you to law
   enforcement authorities or otherwise take appropriate legal action
   including seeking restitution on behalf of ourselves and/or our users.
   Without limiting the foregoing, you agree not to use the Services to:
    A. raise funds or establish or contribute to any Campaign with the
       implicit or explicit purpose of or involving:
         1. violating any law, regulation, industry requirement, or
            third-party guidelines or agreements by which you are bound,
            including those of payment card providers and transaction
            processors that you utilize in connection with the Services;
         2. any election campaigns that are not run by a registered
            organization within the supported country;
         3. content or campaigns that are fraudulent, misleading,
            inaccurate, dishonest, or impossible;
         4. drugs, narcotics, steroids, controlled substances,
            pharmaceuticals or similar products or therapies that are
            either illegal, prohibited, or enjoined by an applicable
            regulatory body; legal substances that provide the same effect
            as an illegal drug; or other products, medical practices, or
            any related equipment or paraphernalia that have been found by
            an applicable regulatory body to cause consumer harm;
         5. knives, explosives, ammunition, firearms, or other weaponry or
            accessories;
         6. annuities, investments, equity or lottery contracts, lay-away
            systems, off-shore banking or similar transactions, money
            service businesses (including currency exchanges, check
            cashing or the like), pyramid schemes, “get rich quick
            schemes” (i.e., Investment opportunities or other services
            that promise high rewards), network marketing and referral
            marketing programs, debt collection or crypto-currencies;
         7. gambling, gaming and/or any other activity with an entry fee
            and a prize, including, but not limited to casino games,
            sports betting, fantasy sports, horse or greyhound racing,
            lottery tickets, raffle tickets, auctions and other ventures
            that facilitate gambling, games of skill or chance (whether or
            not it is legally defined as a lottery), promotions involving
            monetary rewards, including gift cards, or sweepstakes;
         8. campaigns we deem, in our sole discretion, to be in support
            of, or for the legal defense of alleged crimes associated with
            hate, violence, harassment, bullying, discrimination,
            terrorism, or intolerance of any kind relating to race,
            ethnicity, national origin, religious affiliation, sexual
            orientation, sex, gender or gender identity, or serious
            disabilities or diseases;
         9. activities with, in, or involving countries, regions,
            governments, persons, or entities that are subject to U.S. and
            other economic sanctions under applicable law, unless such
            activities are expressly authorized by the appropriate
            governmental authority;
        10. funding a ransom, human trafficking or exploitation,
            vigilantism, bribes or bounty;
        11. pornography or other sexual content;
        12. offensive, graphic, perverse or sensitive content;
        13. the sale of items before the seller has control or possession
            of the item;
        14. collecting payments on behalf of merchants by payment
            processors or otherwise; including but not limited to
            self-payments on campaigns or an attempt to bypass or
            otherwise circumvent the designated method of payment as
            provided by GoFundMe;
        15. credit repair or debt settlement services;
        16. the receipt or grant of cash advances or lines of credit to
            yourself or to another person for purposes other than those
            purposes clearly stated in the Campaign;
        17. publication or removal of content (such as mug shots), where
            the primary purpose of posting such content is to cause or
            raise concerns of reputational harm;
        18. sale or resale of a service without added benefit to the
            buyer; resale of government offerings without authorization or
            added value;
        19. aggregation of funds owed to third parties, factoring, or
            other activities intended to obfuscate the origin of funds;
        20. counterfeit music, movies, software, or other licensed
            materials without the appropriate authorization from the
            rights holder;
        21. products or services that directly infringe or facilitate
            infringement upon the trademark, patent, copyright, trade
            secrets, or proprietary or privacy rights of any third party;
        22. unauthorized sale or resale of brand name or designer products
            or services;
        23. sale of goods or services that are illegally imported or
            exported;
        24. processing where there is no bona fide donation accepted; cash
            advance; card testing; evasion of card network chargeback
            monitoring programs;
        25. collecting or providing funds for any purpose other than as
            described in a Campaign description;
        26. any other activity that GoFundMe may deem in its sole
            discretion to be in support of individuals and/or entities
            associated with alleged financial crimes including but not
            limited to corruption, bribery, tax evasion, fraud, and
            activities of a similar nature; or
        27. any other activity that GoFundMe may deem in its sole
            discretion to be unacceptable.
    B. transmit or otherwise upload any content that (i) infringes any
       intellectual property or other proprietary rights of any party;
       (ii) you do not have a right to upload under any law or under
       contractual or fiduciary relationships; (iii) contains software
       viruses or any other computer code, files or programs designed to
       interrupt, destroy or limit the functionality of any computer
       software or hardware or telecommunications equipment; (iv) poses or
       creates a privacy or security risk to any person; (v) constitutes
       unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials,
       commercial activities and/or sales, "junk mail," "spam," "chain
       letters," "pyramid schemes," "contests," "sweepstakes," or any
       other form of solicitation; or (vi) in the sole judgment of
       GoFundMe, is objectionable or which restricts or inhibits any other
       person from using or enjoying the Services, or which may expose
       GoFundMe or its users to any harm or liability of any type; or
    C. interfere with or disrupt servers or networks connected to the
       Services, or disobey any requirements, procedures, policies or
       regulations of networks connected to the Services; or
    D. harvest or collect email addresses or other contact information of
       other users from the Services by electronic or other means.
    E. raise funds for a minor without the express permission of the
       minor’s guardian unless the funds are transferred into a trust
       account for the sole benefit of the minor.

   Additionally, with respect to all Donations you make or accept through
   the Services, you agree:
     * not to make or accept any donations that you know or suspect to be
       erroneous, suspicious or fraudulent;
     * not to use the Services in or for the benefit of a country,
       organization, entity, or person embargoed or blocked by any
       government, including those on sanctions lists identified by the
       United States Office of Foreign Asset Control (OFAC);
     * to maintain reasonable and standard security measures to protect
       any information transmitted and received through the Services,
       including without limitation by adhering to any security procedures
       and controls required by GoFundMe from time to time;
     * to maintain a copy of all electronic and other records related to
       Campaigns and Donations as necessary for GoFundMe to verify
       compliance with these Terms of Service and make such records
       available to GoFundMe upon our request. For clarity, the foregoing
       does not affect or limit your obligations to maintain documentation
       as required by applicable laws, rules, regulations, or governmental
       authority; and
     * at GoFundMe’s request, including without limitation in case of
       investigations by GoFundMe, a payment processing partner, or a
       regulatory or governmental authority, fully cooperate in the
       auditing of such records, investigation of the relevant
       circumstances and remedy of any uncovered violation or wrongdoing.

   GoFundMe reserves the right to refuse, condition, or suspend any
   Donations or other transactions that we believe in our sole discretion
   may violate the Terms of Service or harm the interests of our users,
   business partners, the public, or GoFundMe, or that expose you,
   GoFundMe, or others to risks unacceptable to us. We may share any
   information related to your use of the Services with the appropriate
   financial institution, regulatory authority, or law enforcement agency
   consistent with our legal obligations. This information may include
   information about you, your account, your Donors, your Donations, and
   transactions made through or in connection with your use of the
   Services.

   Donations: In order to contribute to a Campaign or to a Charity, a
   Donor will be required to provide GoFundMe information regarding its
   credit card or other payment instrument (“Payment Instrument”) that is
   linked to the Donor’s account on the Services (a “Billing Account”).
   You, as a Donor, represent and warrant to GoFundMe that such
   information is true and that you are authorized to use the applicable
   Payment Instrument. You agree that a certain minimum Donation amount
   may apply, and that all Donation payments are final and will not be
   refunded unless GoFundMe, in its sole discretion, agrees to issue a
   refund, for example in accordance with the GoFundMe Guarantee. GoFundMe
   uses third-party payment processing partners to bill you through your
   Payment Instrument and Billing Account for any Donations made, and
   Donors acknowledge that by contributing a Donation to a Campaign, the
   Donor is agreeing to any and all applicable terms set forth by our
   payment partners (currently, WePay, Inc., Stripe, Inc., Adyen LLC,
   PayPal, Inc., and our charity partner, PayPal Giving Fund), in addition
   to these Terms of Service, including WePay’s terms of service, Stripe’s
   terms of service, Adyen’s terms of service, PayPal’s terms of service,
   and PayPal Giving Fund’s terms of service. GoFundMe’s payment partner
   in Australia is Adyen Australia. Adyen Australia contracts with
   GoFundMe’s Australian entity, GoFundMe Australia Pty Ltd (ACN 627 702
   630), which entity is the contracting party responsible for
   transactions benefitting the Australian user.

   Recurring Donations: Donors may have the option to contribute recurring
   period Donations (your agreement to make the Donations on a recurring
   basis, a “Donation Subscription” and each individual Donation made in
   connection with a Donation Subscription, a “Donation Installment”), and
   in electing to contribute on a recurring basis, you, as a Donor hereby
   acknowledge that Donation Subscriptions automatically renew and have a
   recurring payment feature, and that unless and until you opt out of the
   auto-renewal of the Donation Subscription, which can be done through
   the Platform, any Donation Subscriptions you have signed up for will be
   automatically extended for successive renewal periods of the same
   duration as the initial term originally selected. In connection with
   each of your Donation Subscriptions, you (i) hereby authorize GoFundMe
   to bill your Payment Instrument in the amount of the applicable
   Donation Installments in advance on a periodic basis until you
   terminate such periodic payments by opting out of the Donation
   Subscription, (ii) accept responsibility for payment of all Donation
   Installments occurring prior to opt out and (iii) agree to promptly
   update your Billing Account with any changes (for example, any changes
   related to your Payment Instrument, such as a change in your billing
   address or credit card expiration date). Changes to or termination of
   Donation Subscriptions or Donation Installments will apply only to
   Donation Installments that take place after GoFundMe receives notice of
   such change or termination. GoFundMe does not provide refunds of any
   amounts received in connection with previously made Donation
   Installments. Additionally, by enrolling in any Donation Subscriptions,
   you acknowledge and agree for any and all such Donation Subscriptions,
   that (a) the ongoing maintenance and operation of Donation
   Subscriptions and each Donation Installment are the sole responsibility
   of, and subject to the sole discretion of, the individual or entity
   responsible for managing and receiving the Donation Subscription (e.g.,
   the applicable Campaign Organizer or Charity), (b) individual Donation
   Installments may not be tax deductible, even if previous Donation
   Installments for the same Donation Subscription were, and the amount of
   each Donation Installment that is tax deductible may vary, (c) one or
   more specific Donation Installment may not be provided to or received
   by the applicable cause, charity or Campaign if such cause, charity or
   Campaign becomes unavailable, unable to accept Donations, or chooses to
   stop receiving Donations, which may occur for various reasons, such as
   if the cause, charity or Campaign becomes subject to an investigation
   or is suspended or removed from the Services by GoFundMe or (d) the
   amounts actually received by the applicable Campaign, Charity or cause
   may differ from one Donation Installment to the next (for example, if
   the transaction fees associated with the Donation Installment change).

   Your non-termination of a Donation Subscription reaffirms that GoFundMe
   is authorized to charge your Payment Instrument for the Donation
   Subscription in accordance with these terms. This does not waive our
   right to seek payment directly from you.

   Account Holds: From time to time, GoFundMe may (in our sole discretion)
   place a hold on a Campaign account (a "Hold"), restricting Withdrawals
   (defined herein) by a Campaign Organizer. Some of the reasons that we
   may place a Hold on a Campaign Account include the following: (i) if we
   have reason to believe (in our sole discretion) that information
   provided by a Campaign Organizer is false, misleading, or fraudulent,
   or that funds are being used in a prohibited manner, (ii) if the funds
   available (as determined by GoFundMe in its sole discretion) should be
   provided directly to a person other than the Campaign Organizer (such
   as a legal beneficiary or person entitled by law to act on behalf of a
   Campaign Organizer), (iii) if we have reason to believe that a Campaign
   or Campaign Organizer has violated these Terms of Service, (iv) if
   GoFundMe determines that the Campaign Organizer is colluding with
   donors to engage in fraudulent activity, (v) if we have reason to
   believe (in our sole discretion) that there may be suspicious or
   fraudulent donation activity, or (vi) if required in order to comply
   with a court order, subpoena, writ, injunction, or as otherwise
   required under applicable laws and regulations. If you have questions
   about a Hold we may have placed on your Campaign account, or need
   information about how to resolve the Hold, please contact us at
   support@gofundme.com.

   Rewards: Reward Levels are not intended to be items available for
   purchase and GoFundMe does not guarantee the delivery of Reward Levels
   in any way.

   Withdrawing Donations from a Campaign: While GoFundMe strives to make
   Withdrawals available to you promptly, you acknowledge and agree that
   Withdrawals may not be available to you for use immediately, and
   GoFundMe does not guarantee that Withdrawals will be available to you
   within any specific time frame, and GoFundMe expressly disclaims any
   and all responsibility for any delay or inability to access and use
   Withdrawals at any specified time, and any consequences arising from
   such delay or inability. You, as a Campaign Organizer, are responsible
   for ensuring that the information you provide to GoFundMe in order to
   process a Withdrawal, including your bank account information, is
   accurate and up to date. GoFundMe may, at any time, for any reason,
   without notice, and in its sole discretion, offer or issue a refund of
   Donation(s) with or without consulting with you, which may comprise the
   entire amount donated to your campaign. GoFundMe is not liable to you
   or to any third party for any claims, damages, costs, losses, or other
   consequences caused by GoFundMe issuing refunds, including, but not
   limited to transaction or overdraft fees.

   Special Notice for International Use; Export Controls: Software
   (defined below) available in connection with the Services and the
   transmission of applicable data, if any, may be subject to export
   controls and economic sanctions laws of the United States or other
   jurisdictions. No Software may be downloaded from the Services or
   otherwise exported or re-exported in violation of such export control
   and economic sanctions laws. Downloading or using the Software is at
   your sole risk. Recognizing the global nature of the Internet, you
   agree to comply with all local rules and laws regarding your use of the
   Services, including as it concerns online conduct and acceptable
   content.
   Apple-Enabled Software Applications

   GoFundMe offers Software applications that are intended to be operated
   in connection with products made commercially available by Apple Inc.
   ("Apple"), among other platforms. With respect to Software that is made
   available for your use in connection with an Apple-branded product
   (such Software, "Apple-Enabled Software"), in addition to the other
   terms and conditions set forth in these Terms of Service, the following
   terms and conditions apply:
     * GoFundMe and you acknowledge that these Terms of Service are
       concluded between GoFundMe and you only, and not with Apple, and
       that as between GoFundMe and Apple, GoFundMe, not Apple, is solely
       responsible for the Apple-Enabled Software and the content thereof.
     * You may not use the Apple-Enabled Software in any manner that is in
       violation of or inconsistent with the Usage Rules set forth for
       Apple-Enabled Software in, or otherwise be in conflict with, the
       App Store Terms of Service.
     * Your license to use the Apple-Enabled Software is limited to a
       non-transferable license to use the Apple-Enabled Software on an
       iOS Product that you own or control, as permitted by the Usage
       Rules set forth in the App Store Terms of Service.
     * Apple has no obligation whatsoever to provide any maintenance or
       support services with respect to the Apple-Enabled Software.
     * Apple is not responsible for any product warranties, whether
       express or implied by law. In the event of any failure of the
       Apple-Enabled Software to conform to any applicable warranty, you
       may notify Apple, and Apple will refund the purchase price for the
       Apple-Enabled Software to you, if any; and, to the maximum extent
       permitted by applicable law, Apple will have no other warranty
       obligation whatsoever with respect to the Apple-Enabled Software,
       or any other claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs or
       expenses attributable to any failure to conform to any warranty,
       which will be GoFundMe's sole responsibility, to the extent it
       cannot be disclaimed under applicable law.
     * GoFundMe and you acknowledge that GoFundMe, not Apple, is
       responsible for addressing any claims of you or any third party
       relating to the Apple-Enabled Software or your possession and/or
       use of that Apple-Enabled Software, including, but not limited to:
       (i) product liability claims; (ii) any claim that the Apple-Enabled
       Software fails to conform to any applicable legal or regulatory
       requirement; and (iii) claims arising under consumer protection or
       similar legislation.
     * In the event of any third party claim that the Apple-Enabled
       Software or the end-user's possession and use of that Apple-Enabled
       Software infringes that third party's intellectual property rights,
       as between GoFundMe and Apple, GoFundMe, not Apple, will be solely
       responsible for the investigation, defense, settlement and
       discharge of any such intellectual property infringement claim.
     * You represent and warrant that (i) you are not located in a country
       that is subject to a U.S. Government embargo, or that has been
       designated by the U.S. Government as a "terrorist supporting"
       country; (ii) you are not listed on any U.S. Government list of
       prohibited or restricted parties and (iii) you are not located in
       any other country or jurisdiction from which you would be barred
       from using the Services by applicable law.
     * If you have any questions, complaints or claims with respect to the
       Apple-Enabled Software, they should be directed to GoFundMe as
       follows:
       support@gofundme.com
       855 Jefferson Ave PO Box 1329
       Redwood City, CA 94063

   GoFundMe and you acknowledge and agree that Apple, and Apple's
   subsidiaries, are third-party beneficiaries of these Terms of Service
   with respect to the Apple-Enabled Software, and that, upon your
   acceptance of the terms and conditions of these Terms of Service, Apple
   will have the right (and will be deemed to have accepted the right) to
   enforce these Terms of Service against you with respect to the
   Apple-Enabled Software as a third-party beneficiary thereof.
   Accordingly, the parties acknowledge and agree that GoFundMe enters
   into this clause (“Apple-Enabled Software Applications”) for its own
   benefit and on its own behalf and also as an agent for the benefit and
   on behalf of Apple and its subsidiaries with respect to the exercise
   and enforcement of all rights, benefits and remedies of Apple and its
   subsidiaries (but not any obligation or burden) in this clause
   (“Apple-Enabled Software Applications”) which rights, benefits and
   remedies shall be enforceable by GoFundMe in its own right and also as
   agent for and on behalf of each of Apple and its subsidiaries. GoFundMe
   may amend, terminate or rescind these Terms of Service without the
   consent of Apple or any such subsidiary.
   Intellectual Property Rights

   Services Content, Software and Trademarks: You acknowledge and agree
   that the Services may contain content or features ("Services Content")
   that are protected by copyright, patent, trademark, trade secret or
   other proprietary rights and laws. Except as expressly authorized by
   GoFundMe, you agree not to modify, copy, frame, scrape, rent, lease,
   loan, sell, distribute or create derivative works based on the Services
   or the Services Content, in whole or in part, except that the foregoing
   does not apply to your own User Content (as defined below) that you
   legally upload to the Services. In connection with your use of the
   Services you will not engage in or use any data mining, robots,
   scraping or similar data gathering or extraction methods. If you are
   blocked by GoFundMe from accessing the Services (including by blocking
   your IP address), you agree not to implement any measures to circumvent
   such blocking (e.g., by masking your IP address or using a proxy IP
   address). Any use of the Services or the Services Content other than as
   specifically authorized herein is strictly prohibited. The technology
   and software underlying the Services or distributed in connection
   therewith are the property of GoFundMe, our affiliates and our partners
   (the "Software"). You agree not to copy, modify, create a derivative
   work of, reverse engineer, reverse assemble or otherwise attempt to
   discover any source code, sell, assign, sublicense, or otherwise
   transfer any right in the Software. Any rights not expressly granted
   herein are reserved by GoFundMe.

   The GoFundMe name and logos are trademarks and service marks of
   GoFundMe (collectively the "GoFundMe Trademarks"). Other company,
   product, and service names and logos used and displayed via the
   Services may be trademarks or service marks of their respective owners,
   who may or may not endorse or be affiliated with or connected to
   GoFundMe. Nothing in these Terms of Service or the Services should be
   construed as granting, by implication, estoppel, or otherwise, any
   license or right to use any of GoFundMe Trademarks displayed on the
   Services, without our prior written permission in each instance. All
   goodwill generated from the use of GoFundMe Trademarks will inure to
   our exclusive benefit.

   Third-Party Material: Under no circumstances will GoFundMe be liable in
   any way for any content or materials of any third parties (including
   users and Campaign Organizers) or any User Content (defined below,
   including, but not limited to, for any errors or omissions in any
   content, or for any loss or damage of any kind incurred as a result of
   the use of any such content. You acknowledge that GoFundMe does not
   pre-screen content, but that GoFundMe and its designees will have the
   right (but not the obligation) in their sole discretion to refuse,
   remove, or allow any content that is available via the Services at any
   time and for any reason, with or without notice, and without any
   liability to you or to any third party for any claims, damages, costs
   or losses resulting therefrom.

   User Content Transmitted Through the Services: With respect to the
   content, photos, videos, images, trademarks, logos, brands or other
   materials you upload or post through the Services or share with other
   users or recipients (collectively, "User Content"), you represent and
   warrant that you own all right, title and interest in and to, or
   otherwise have all necessary rights and consents to (and to allow
   others to) fully exploit, such User Content, including, without
   limitation, as it concerns all copyrights, trademark rights and rights
   of publicity or privacy related thereto. By uploading, sharing,
   providing, or otherwise making available any User Content, or any
   portion thereof, in connection with the Services, you hereby grant and
   will grant GoFundMe and its affiliated companies and users a
   nonexclusive, worldwide, royalty free, fully paid up, transferable,
   sublicensable, perpetual, irrevocable license to copy, display, upload,
   perform, distribute, store, modify and otherwise use your User Content
   in connection with the operation of the Services or the promotion,
   advertising or marketing thereof, in any form, medium or technology now
   known or later developed. Without limiting the foregoing, if any User
   Content contains your name, image or likeness, you hereby release and
   hold harmless GoFundMe and its contractors and employees, from (i) all
   claims for invasion of privacy, publicity or libel, (ii) any liability
   or other claims by virtue of any blurring, distortion, alteration,
   optical illusion, or other use or exploitation of your name, image or
   likeness, and (iii) any liability for claims made by you (or any
   successor to any claim you might bring) in connection with your User
   Content, name, image or likeness. You waive any right to inspect or
   approve any intermediary version(s) or finished version(s) of the
   results of the use of your User Content (including your name, image or
   likeness). Further, if any person (other than you) appears in your User
   Content, you represent and warrant that you have secured all necessary
   licenses, waivers and releases from such person(s) for the benefit of
   GoFundMe in a manner fully consistent with the licenses, waivers and
   releases set forth above. You further acknowledge that your
   participation in the Services and submission of User Content is
   voluntary and that you will not receive financial compensation of any
   type associated with the licenses, waivers, and releases set forth
   herein (or GoFundMe's exploitation thereof), and that the sole
   consideration for subject matter of this agreement is the opportunity
   to use the Services.

   We do not guarantee that any Services Content will be made available
   through the Services. We reserve the right to, but do not have any
   obligation to, (i) remove, edit or modify any Services Content or User
   Content, in our sole discretion, at any time, without notice to you and
   for any reason (including, but not limited to, upon receipt of claims
   or allegations from third parties or authorities relating to such
   Services Content or User Content, or if we are concerned that you may
   have violated these Terms of Service), or for no reason at all and (ii)
   to remove or block any Services Content or User Content from the
   Services.

   You acknowledge and agree that any questions, comments, suggestions,
   ideas, feedback or other information about the Services
   ("Submissions"), provided by you to GoFundMe are non-confidential and
   GoFundMe will be entitled to the unrestricted use and dissemination of
   these Submissions for any purpose, commercial or otherwise, without
   acknowledgment or compensation to you.

   You acknowledge and agree that GoFundMe may preserve content and may
   also disclose content if required to do so by law or in the good-faith
   belief that such preservation or disclosure is reasonably necessary to
   (a) comply with legal process, applicable laws or government requests;
   (b) enforce these Terms of Service; (c) respond to claims that any
   content violates the rights of third parties; or (d) protect the
   rights, property, or personal safety of GoFundMe, its users or the
   public.

   Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard: The Payment Card Industry
   Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) is a set of industry-mandated
   requirements for any business that handles, processes, or stores credit
   cards. The primary purpose of the standards is to maintain controls
   around cardholder data to reduce credit card fraud. As a service
   provider, GoFundMe is PCI DSS compliant and will maintain all
   applicable PCI DSS requirements to the extent that we possess or
   otherwise store, process, or transmit cardholder data on behalf of you,
   or to the extent that we can in any way impact the security of your
   cardholder data environment.

   Copyright Complaints: GoFundMe respects the intellectual property of
   others, and we ask our users to do the same. If you believe that your
   work has been copied in a way that constitutes copyright infringement,
   or that your intellectual property rights have been otherwise violated,
   you should notify GoFundMe of your infringement claim in accordance
   with the procedure set forth below.

   GoFundMe will process and investigate notices of alleged infringement
   and will take appropriate actions under the Digital Millennium
   Copyright Act ("DMCA") and other applicable intellectual property laws
   with respect to any alleged or actual infringement. A notification of
   claimed copyright infringement should be emailed to GoFundMe's
   Copyright Agent at support@gofundme.com (Subject line: "DMCA Takedown
   Request"). You may also contact us by mail or facsimile at:

   GoFundMe Copyright Agent:
   GoFundMe, Inc.
   Attn: Legal
   855 Jefferson Ave PO Box 1329
   Redwood City, CA 94063

   To be effective, the notification must be in writing and contain the
   following information:
     * an electronic or physical signature of the person authorized to act
       on behalf of the owner of the copyright or other intellectual
       property interest;
     * a description of the copyrighted work or other intellectual
       property that you claim has been infringed;
     * a description of where the material that you claim is infringing is
       located on the Services, with enough detail that we may find it on
       the Services;
     * your address, telephone number, and email address;
     * a statement by you that you have a good faith belief that the
       disputed use is not authorized by the copyright or intellectual
       property owner, its agent, or the law; and
     * a statement by you, made under penalty of perjury, that the above
       information in your notice is accurate and that you are the
       copyright or intellectual property owner or authorized to act on
       the copyright or intellectual property owner's behalf.

   Counter-Notice: If you believe that your User Content that was removed
   (or to which access was disabled) is not infringing, or that you have
   the authorization from the copyright owner, the copyright owner's
   agent, or pursuant to the law, to upload and use the content in your
   User Content, you may send a written counter-notice containing the
   following information to the above-listed Copyright Agent:
     * your physical or electronic signature;
     * identification of the content that has been removed or to which
       access has been disabled and the location at which the content
       appeared before it was removed or disabled;
     * a statement that you have a good-faith belief that the content was
       removed or disabled as a result of mistake or a misidentification
       of the content; and
     * your name, address, telephone number, and email address, and a
       statement that you will accept service of process from the person
       who provided notification of the alleged infringement.

   If a counter-notice is received by the Copyright Agent, GoFundMe will
   send a copy of the counter-notice to the original complaining party,
   informing that person that it may replace the removed content or cease
   disabling it in 10 business days. Unless the copyright owner files an
   action seeking a court order against the content provider, member or
   user, the removed content may be replaced, or access to it restored, in
   10 to 14 business days or more after receipt of the counter-notice, at
   our sole discretion.

   Repeat Infringer Policy: In accordance with the DMCA and other
   applicable law, GoFundMe has adopted a policy of terminating, in
   appropriate circumstances and at GoFundMe's sole discretion, users who
   are deemed to be repeat infringers. GoFundMe may also at its sole
   discretion limit access to the Services and/or terminate the
   memberships of any users who infringe any intellectual property rights
   of others, whether or not there is any repeat infringement.
   Third Party Websites/Services

   The Services or third parties may provide or facilitate links, tools,
   widgets or other features that allow you to access other sites,
   services and resources provided by third parties (collectively, “Third
   Party Resources”). GoFundMe has no control over such Third Party
   Resources or any products, services or content made available through
   or by such Third Party Resources, or the business practices of the
   third parties providing such Third Party Resources, and GoFundMe is not
   responsible for and does not endorse such Third Party Resources or the
   products, services or content made available thereby. You acknowledge
   that GoFundMe is not responsible or liable for the content, functions,
   accuracy, legality, appropriateness or any other aspect of such Third
   Party Resources. You further acknowledge and agree that GoFundMe will
   not be responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or
   loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with use of or
   reliance on any content, events, goods or services available on or
   through any such Third Party Resources. Any dealings you have with
   third parties found while using the Services are between you and the
   third party and may be subject to additional terms provided by the
   third party, which you agree to by using such Third Party Resources,
   and you agree that GoFundMe is not liable for any loss or claim that
   you may have against any such third party.
   Indemnity and Release

   You agree to release, indemnify on demand and hold GoFundMe and its
   affiliates and their officers, employees, directors and agents harmless
   from any and all losses, damages, expenses, including reasonable
   attorneys' fees, costs, awards, fines, damages, rights, claims, actions
   of any kind and injury (including death) arising out of or relating to
   your use of the Services, any Donation or Campaign, any User Content,
   your connection to the Services, your violation of these Terms of
   Service or your violation of any rights of another. You agree that
   GoFundMe has the right to conduct its own defense of any claims at its
   own discretion, and that you will indemnify GoFundMe for the costs of
   its defense (including, but not limited to attorney’s fees.) If you are
   a California resident, you waive California Civil Code Section 1542,
   which says: "A general release does not extend to claims which the
   creditor does not know or suspect to exist in his favor at the time of
   executing the release, which if known by him must have materially
   affected his settlement with the debtor." If you are a resident of
   another jurisdiction—in or outside of the United States—you waive any
   comparable statute or doctrine.
   Disclaimer of Warranties

   YOUR USE OF THE SERVICES IS AT YOUR SOLE RISK. THE SERVICES ARE
   PROVIDED ON AN "AS IS" AND "AS AVAILABLE" BASIS. GOFUNDME AND ITS
   AFFILIATES EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM AND EXCLUDE, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT
   PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ALL WARRANTIES, CONDITIONS AND
   REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY,
   INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF
   MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE AND
   NON-INFRINGEMENT.

   GOFUNDME AND ITS AFFILIATES MAKE NO WARRANTY OR CONDITION THAT (I) THE
   SERVICES WILL MEET YOUR REQUIREMENTS, (II) THE SERVICES WILL BE
   UNINTERRUPTED, TIMELY, SECURE, OR ERROR-FREE, (III) THE RESULTS THAT
   MAY BE OBTAINED FROM THE USE OF THE SERVICES WILL BE ACCURATE OR
   RELIABLE, OR (IV) THE QUALITY OF ANY PRODUCTS, SERVICES, INFORMATION,
   OR OTHER MATERIAL PURCHASED OR OBTAINED BY YOU THROUGH THE SERVICES
   WILL MEET YOUR EXPECTATIONS.
   Limitation of Liability

   YOU EXPRESSLY UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT
   PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, NEITHER GOFUNDME NOR ITS AFFILIATES WILL
   BE LIABLE FOR ANY (A) INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, CONSEQUENTIAL,
   PUNITIVE OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, (B) DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, (C)
   DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF GOODWILL, (D) DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF USE, (E) LOSS OR
   CORRUPTION OF DATA, OR (F) OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF GOFUNDME
   HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), WHETHER BASED ON
   CONTRACT, TORT, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY OR OTHERWISE, RESULTING
   FROM (I) THE USE OR THE INABILITY TO USE THE SERVICES; (II) THE COST OF
   PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS AND SERVICES RESULTING FROM ANY GOODS,
   DATA, INFORMATION OR SERVICES PURCHASED OR OBTAINED OR MESSAGES
   RECEIVED OR TRANSACTIONS ENTERED INTO THROUGH OR FROM THE SERVICES;
   (III) ANY PROMOTIONS AND RELATED PRIZES OR REWARDS MADE AVAILABLE
   THROUGH THE SERVICES; (IV) UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO OR ALTERATION OF YOUR
   TRANSMISSIONS OR DATA; (V) STATEMENTS OR CONDUCT OF ANY THIRD PARTY ON
   THE SERVICES; OR (VI) ANY OTHER MATTER RELATING TO THE SERVICES. TO THE
   FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN NO EVENT WILL GOFUNDME'S
   TOTAL LIABILITY TO YOU FOR ALL DAMAGES, LOSSES (INCLUDING CONTRACT,
   NEGLIGENCE, STATUTORY LIABILITY OR OTHERWISE) OR CAUSES OF ACTION
   EXCEED THE AMOUNT YOU HAVE PAID GOFUNDME IN THE LAST SIX (6) MONTHS,
   OR, IF GREATER, ONE HUNDRED DOLLARS ($100).

   SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES OR
   THE LIMITATION OR EXCLUSION OF LIABILITY FOR INCIDENTAL OR
   CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES. ACCORDINGLY, SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH
   ABOVE MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU. IF YOU ARE DISSATISFIED WITH ANY PORTION OF
   THE SERVICES OR WITH THESE TERMS OF SERVICE, YOUR SOLE AND EXCLUSIVE
   REMEDY IS TO DISCONTINUE USE OF THE SERVICES.
   DISPUTES

   ARBITRATION CLAUSE & CLASS ACTION WAIVER – IMPORTANT – PLEASE REVIEW AS
   THIS AFFECTS YOUR LEGAL RIGHTS

   Arbitration; Class Action Waiver. YOU AGREE THAT ALL DISPUTES BETWEEN
   YOU AND US OR ANY OF OUR OFFICERS, DIRECTORS OR EMPLOYEES ACTING IN
   THEIR CAPACITY AS SUCH (WHETHER OR NOT SUCH DISPUTE INVOLVES A THIRD
   PARTY) WITH REGARD TO YOUR RELATIONSHIP WITH US, INCLUDING WITHOUT
   LIMITATION DISPUTES RELATED TO THESE TERMS OF SERVICE, YOUR USE OF THE
   SERVICES, AND/OR RIGHTS OF PRIVACY AND/OR PUBLICITY, WILL BE RESOLVED
   BY BINDING, INDIVIDUAL ARBITRATION AND YOU AND WE HEREBY EXPRESSLY
   WAIVE TRIAL BY JURY. DISCOVERY AND RIGHTS TO APPEAL IN ARBITRATION ARE
   GENERALLY MORE LIMITED THAN IN A LAWSUIT, AND OTHER RIGHTS THAT YOU AND
   WE WOULD HAVE IN COURT MAY NOT BE AVAILABLE IN ARBITRATION. YOU
   UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT, BY ENTERING INTO THESE TERMS, YOU AND WE ARE
   EACH WAIVING OUR RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY OR TO PARTICIPATE IN A CLASS
   ACTION.

   Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in these Terms of Service will
   be deemed to waive, preclude, or otherwise limit the right of either of
   us to (a) bring an individual action in small claims court; (b) pursue
   an enforcement action through the applicable federal, state, or local
   agency if that action is available; (c) seek injunctive relief in a
   court of law; or (d) file suit in a court of law to address an
   intellectual property infringement claim.

   The Process. Any arbitration between you and us will be settled under
   the Federal Arbitration Act and administered by the American
   Arbitration Association (“AAA”) under its Consumer Arbitration Rules
   (collectively, “AAA Rules”) as modified by these Terms of Service. The
   AAA Rules and filing forms are available online at www.adr.org by
   calling the AAA at 1-800-778-7879.

   A party who intends to seek arbitration must first send a written
   notice of the dispute to the other party by certified U.S. Mail or by
   Federal Express (signature required) or, only if that other party has
   not provided a current physical address, then by electronic mail
   (“Notice of Arbitration”). Our current address for Notice is: GoFundMe,
   Inc. 855 Jefferson Avenue, Redwood City, CA 94063. The Notice of
   Arbitration must: (a) describe the nature and basis of the claim or
   dispute; and (b) set forth the specific relief sought (“Demand”). We
   agree to work with you and make a good faith effort to resolve the
   claim directly, but if we aren’t successful within 60 days after the
   Notice of Arbitration is received, you or we may commence an
   arbitration proceeding. All arbitration proceedings between the parties
   will be confidential unless otherwise agreed by the parties in writing.
   During the arbitration, the amount of any settlement offer made by
   either of us must not be disclosed to the arbitrator until after the
   arbitrator makes a final decision and award, if any. If the arbitrator
   awards you an amount which exceeds the last written settlement amount
   offered by us in settlement of the dispute prior to the award, we will
   pay to you the higher of: (i) the amount awarded by the arbitrator; or
   (ii) $10,000.00.

   Fees. If you commence arbitration in accordance with these Terms of
   Service, we will reimburse you for your payment of the filing fee
   unless your claim is for more than $10,000 in which case the payment of
   any fees will be decided by the AAA Rules. Any arbitration hearing will
   take place at an agreed upon location in San Francisco, California, but
   if the claim is for $10,000 or less, you may choose whether the
   arbitration will be conducted: (a) solely on the basis of documents
   submitted to the arbitrator; (b) through a telephone hearing or (c) by
   an in-person hearing as established by the AAA Rules in the county of
   your billing address. If the arbitration finds that either the
   substance of your claim or the relief sought in the Demand is frivolous
   or brought for an improper purpose (as measured by the standards set
   forth in the Federal Rule of Civil procedure 11(b), then the payment of
   all fees will be governed by the AAA Rules. In that case, you agree to
   reimburse us for all monies previously disbursed by us that are
   otherwise your obligation to pay under the AAA Rules. Regardless of the
   manner in which the arbitration is conducted, the arbitrator must issue
   a reasoned written decision sufficient to explain the essential
   findings and conclusions on which the decision and award, if any, are
   based. The arbitrator may make rulings and resolve disputes as to the
   payment and reimbursement of fees or expenses at any time during the
   proceeding and upon request from either party made within 14 days of
   the arbitrator’s ruling on the merits.
     * No Class Actions. YOU AND WE AGREE THAT EACH MAY BRING CLAIMS TO
       THE FULLEST EXTENT LEGALLY PERMISSIBLE AGAINST THE OTHER ONLY IN
       YOUR OR ITS INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY AND NOT AS A PLAINTIFF OR CLASS
       MEMBER IN ANY PURPORTED CLASS OR REPRESENTATIVE PROCEEDING.
       Further, unless both you and we agree otherwise, the arbitrator may
       not consolidate more than one person’s claims and may not otherwise
       preside over any form of a representative or class proceeding.
     * Modifications to this Arbitration Provision. If we make any future
       change to this arbitration provision, other than a change to our
       address for Notice of Arbitration, you may reject the change by
       sending us written notice within 30 days of the change to our
       address for Notice of Arbitration, in which case your account with
       us will be immediately terminated and this arbitration provision,
       as in effect immediately prior to the changes you rejected will
       survive.
     * Enforceability. If this Disputes section is found to be
       unenforceable, then the entirety of this Disputes section will be
       null and void and, in that case, the parties agree that the
       exclusive jurisdiction and venue described in the General section
       below will govern any action arising out of or related to these
       Terms of Service.

   Confidentiality. We each agree to keep the arbitration proceedings, all
   information exchanged between us, and any settlement offers
   confidential, unless otherwise required by law or requested by law
   enforcement or any court or governmental body. However, we may each
   disclose these matters, in confidence, to our respective accountants,
   auditors, and insurance providers.
   Termination

   You agree that GoFundMe, in its sole discretion, may suspend or
   terminate your account (or any part thereof) or your access to the
   Services and remove and discard any content or data at any time and for
   any reason, with or without notice, and without any liability to you or
   to any third party for any claims, damages, costs or losses resulting
   therefrom.
   User Disputes

   You agree that you are solely responsible for your interactions with
   any other user in connection with the Services and GoFundMe will have
   no liability or responsibility with respect thereto. GoFundMe reserves
   the right, but has no obligation, to become involved in any way with
   disputes between you and any other user of the Services.
   General

   These Terms of Service constitute the entire agreement between you and
   GoFundMe and govern your use of the Services, superseding any prior
   agreements between you and GoFundMe with respect to the Services. You
   also may be subject to additional terms and conditions that may apply
   when you use affiliate or third-party services, third-party content or
   third-party software. These Terms of Service will be governed by the
   laws of the State of California without regard to its conflict of law
   provisions. With respect to any disputes or claims not subject to
   arbitration, as set forth above, you and GoFundMe agree to submit to
   the personal and exclusive jurisdiction of the state and federal courts
   located within San Mateo County, California. The failure of GoFundMe to
   exercise or enforce any right or provision of these Terms of Service
   will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. If any
   provision of these Terms of Service is found by a court of competent
   jurisdiction to be (or are otherwise) invalid, the parties nevertheless
   agree that the court should endeavor to give effect to the parties’
   intentions as reflected in the provision, and the other provisions of
   these Terms of Service remain in full force and effect. You agree that
   regardless of any statute or law to the contrary, any claim or cause of
   action arising out of or related to use of the Services or these Terms
   of Service must be filed within one (1) year after such claim or cause
   of action arose or be forever barred. A printed version of this
   agreement and of any notice given in electronic form will be admissible
   in judicial or administrative proceedings based upon or relating to
   this agreement to the same extent and subject to the same conditions as
   other business documents and records originally generated and
   maintained in printed form. You may not assign these Terms of Service
   without the prior written consent of GoFundMe, but GoFundMe may assign
   or transfer these Terms of Service, in whole or in part, without
   restriction. If we fail to enforce any of our rights, that does not
   result in a waiver of that right. The section titles in these Terms of
   Service are for convenience only and have no legal or contractual
   effect. Notices to you may be made via either email or regular mail.
   The Services may also provide notices to you of changes to these Terms
   of Service or other matters by displaying notices or links to notices
   generally on the Platform.
   Privacy Policy

   At GoFundMe, we respect the privacy of our users. For details please
   see our Privacy Policy. By using the Services, you consent to our
   collection and use of personal data as outlined therein. If you are in
   Europe, by using the Services, you acknowledge GoFundMe's collection
   and use of personal information as described in the Privacy Policy.
   Questions? Concerns? Suggestions?

   Please contact us at support@gofundme.com to report any violations of
   these Terms of Service or to pose any questions regarding these Terms
   of Service or the Services.

Common Questions

   Learn more about GoFundMe and how it can help you fundraise.
   Learn More

Download the App

   Our native Android and iOS apps unlock GoFundMe's full potential!
   Available on the App Store
   Get it on Google Play

Why GoFundMe?

     * Mobile-Friendly Campaigns
     * No penalties for missing goal
     * GoFundMe Mobile App

     * No deadlines or goal requirements
     * Expert advice, 24/7
     * Keep every donation you receive

   Start a GoFundMe

#1 Fundraising platform

   People have raised more money on GoFundMe than anywhere else.
   How it works

GoFundMe Guarantee

   Your donation is protected. If anything is not right, we’ll give you a
   full refund.
   Learn more

GoFundMe app

   Our Android and iOS apps make it easy to fundraise on-the-go.
   Download
     * Get Started
          + How It Works
          + Why GoFundMe
          + Common Questions
          + Success Stories
          + Sign Up Now
     * Top Categories
          + Medical Fundraising
          + Memorial Fundraising
          + Charity Fundraising
     * Learn More
          + About Us
          + GoFundMe Stories
          + Press
          + Campaign Tips
          + We're Hiring!
     * Get Support
          + Help Center
          + Supported Countries & Currencies
          + Blog

   [English (US)]
   Get Started
     * How It Works
     * Why GoFundMe
     * Common Questions
     * Success Stories
     * Sign Up Now

   Top Categories
     * Medical Fundraising
     * Memorial Fundraising
     * Charity Fundraising

   Learn More
     * About Us
     * GoFundMe Stories
     * Press
     * Campaign Tips
     * We're Hiring!

   Get Support
     * Help Center
     * Supported Countries & Currencies
     * Blog

     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal

   © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     *
     *
     *
     *

     * © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal

     *
     *
     *
     *
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.google-analytics.com/gtm/ns?id=GTM-KJFLHK

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TDTFTZ

   GoFundMe (BUTTON)

   Raise money for any cause
   Start a GoFundMe
     * Home
     * Sign up
     * How it works
     * Help
     * Sign in

     * ____________________

     * Start a GoFundMe

   (BUTTON)
   ____________________

     Try searching for locations, campaign titles and names
     * Explore Category
     * Medical
       Medical
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Surgery Financial Help
          + Gender Confirmation Surgery Guide
          + Medical Campaigns
          + Cancer
          + Breast Cancer
          + IVF
     * Volunteer
       Volunteer
       View All
          + Volunteer Campaigns
     * Emergencies
       Emergencies
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Paying for Hurricanes, Storms, Floods, Fires
          + Emergencies Campaigns
     * Education
       Education
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Fundraising Ideas for School Clubs
          + Education Campaigns
          + Extracurriculars
          + College Tuition
          + Classroom
     * Memorials
       Memorials
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + How to Set up a Memorial Fund
          + Funeral & Memorial Costs Guide
          + Memorials Campaigns
     * Sports
       Sports
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Raising Money for Cheerleading & Dance
          + Sports Campaigns
     * Animals
       Animals
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Saving Money on Vet Bills
          + Pet Fundraising: 5 Tips
          + Animals Campaigns
     * Wishes
       Wishes
       View All
          + Wishes Campaigns
     * Competitions
       Competitions
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Guide to Beauty Pageants on a Budget
          + Competitions Campaigns
     * Other
       Other
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Financial Help for Veterans
          + Other Campaigns
     * Newlyweds
       Newlyweds
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Saving Money on Weddings
          + Newlyweds Campaigns
     * Charity
       Charity
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Helping a Charity Fundraise
          + Charity Campaigns
     * Faith
       Faith
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Fundraising for Your Church
          + Faith Campaigns
     * Travel
       Travel
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + How to Deal with Travel Costs
          + Travel Campaigns
     * Creative
       Creative
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + 5 Tips to Make Money as an Artist
          + Creative Campaigns
     * Community
       Community
       View All
          + Community Campaigns
     * Events
       Events
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Event Planning on a Budget
          + Events Campaigns
     * Business
       Business
       View All
       Learning Resources
          + Guide to Saving Local Businesses, Restaurants & Stores
          + Business Campaigns
     * Family
       Family
       View All
          + Family Campaigns

Privacy Policy

Questions about our privacy policy? Contact Us

   Date of Last Revision: September 12, 2018.

   Welcome to the web site or mobile application (as the case may be)
   (collectively, the "Platform") of GoFundMe, Inc. (including its
   subsidiaries, affiliates, agents, and service providers, collectively,
   "GoFundMe," "we," "us," and/or "our"). This Platform is operated by
   GoFundMe and has been created to provide information about our company,
   our online platform designed to permit users to post a fundraising
   campaign to accept monetary donations, and our related services
   (together with the Platform, the "Services") to our Services users and
   visitors ("you," and/or "your"). Except as provided below, this Privacy
   Policy describes and governs how we collect, use, share and protect
   data collected from users of or visitors to the Platform.

   Before you use or submit any information through or in connection with
   the Services, please carefully review this Privacy Policy. By using any
   part of the Services, you consent to the collection, use, and
   disclosure of your information as further outlined in this Privacy
   Policy.

   If you are in Europe:

     * for the purposes of the EU General Data Protection Regulation
       2016/679 (the "GDPR"), the data controller is GoFundMe, Inc. and
       can be reached at the address set out at "Contacting GoFundMe"
       below;
     * "information" covers all personal data processed by us which means
       information that (either in isolation or in combination with other
       information) enables you to be identified directly or indirectly;
       and
     * you will not need to consent to this Privacy Policy, but do
       acknowledge you have read and understood its terms.

   Information We Collect

   As further described below, when you use or otherwise access the
   Services, we may collect information in multiple ways, including when
   you provide information directly to us, and when we passively collect
   information from your browser or device.
    A. Information That You Provide Directly to Us:
       We collect information from you (including, but not limited to,
       your name, email address, and location) when you voluntarily
       provide such information, such as when you contact us with
       inquiries, respond to one of our surveys, provide us with feedback,
       register for access to the Services, or use certain Services.
       You may also provide us with information relating to third
       parties—including information stored in your email and mobile
       device address books—such as, without limitation, names, email
       addresses, and phone numbers of your contacts (collectively,
       “Third-Party Data”). The Services may request your permission to
       access such Third-Party Data.
       You may also provide us with special categories of personal data
       under the GDPR (also known as sensitive data) about yourself and/or
       third parties, such as health information. When you provide such
       information, we will seek your explicit consent unless it is being
       published in relation to your campaign.
       We collect this information for the purposes described below in the
       section entitled, Our Use of Information Collected. While you are
       under no obligation to directly provide us with such information,
       should you choose to withhold such information, we may not be able
       to provide you with some or all of the Services.
       If you provide “personal data” (as defined under the Privacy Shield
       principles – See Privacy Shield section for more information on how
       we treat information from users who reside in the European Union,
       European Economic Area, and Switzerland) to the Services, you
       acknowledge and agree that such personal data may be transferred
       from your current location to the offices and servers of GoFundMe
       and the authorized third parties referred to herein located in the
       United States.
       Our Services may include online chats and message boards. Please
       remember that any information that is disclosed in these areas
       becomes public information for both us and other users to use and
       share. Please be considerate and respectful of others while using
       the community to share your opinions. We reserve the right, but do
       not have the obligation, to review and monitor such posting or any
       other content on our Services, and to remove postings or content
       that may be viewed as inappropriate or offensive to others.
    B. Information That is Passively or Automatically Collected
         I. Device & Usage Information:
            When you interact with GoFundMe through the Services, we
            automatically receive and store certain information from
            devices that you use to access the Services. This information
            is collected passively using various technologies, and
            includes the type of internet browser or mobile device you
            use, any website from which you have come to the Services,
            your operating system, and may include location data through
            an IP address that identifies the city and state where you
            logged into the Platform or your precise geo-location if you
            have permitted your mobile device to provide that information
            to us. GoFundMe may store such information itself or such
            information may be included in databases owned and maintained
            by GoFundMe affiliates, agents or service providers.
        II. Aggregated Data:
            In an ongoing effort to better understand and serve the users
            of the Services, GoFundMe often conducts research on its
            customer demographics, interests and behavior based on
            information we collect. We may de-identify and/or aggregate
            the information collected through the Services for research
            purposes or any other purposes, and we may share this data
            with our affiliates, agents, business partners, or other third
            parties.
        III. Location Information:
            When you use the Services to organize a fundraising campaign,
            the Services may request that you provide your city or town
            and state or province of residence. Please keep in mind that
            other users of the Services may be able to view your city or
            town and state or province of residence in connection with the
            campaign, if it is made available within GoFundMe's Public
            Search Directory. We may also use your location information in
            an aggregate way, as described above in the "Aggregated Data"
            section.
        IV. Cookies and Other Electronic Technologies:
            When you interact with the Services, we try to make that
            experience simple and meaningful. When you visit our Platform,
            our web server sends a cookie to your computer or mobile
            device. Cookies are small pieces of information that are
            issued to your computer or mobile device when you visit a
            website or access or use a mobile application, and that store
            and sometimes track information about your use of the
            Platform. A number of cookies we use last only for the
            duration of your web or application session and expire when
            you close your browser or exit the application. Other cookies
            are used to remember you when you return to the Platform and
            will last longer.
            Some of the cookies used by the Platform are set by us, and
            some are set by third parties who are delivering services on
            our behalf.
            We may use cookies, and similar technologies to cookies, to
            collect information about your access and use of the Platform.
            For example, we may use cookies or other technologies that:
            (1) allow you to navigate and use all the features provided by
            our Platform; (2) customize elements of the layout and/or
            content within the Platform and remember that you have visited
            us before; (3) identify the number of unique visitors we
            receive; (4) allow us to provide you with a customized
            experience; and (5) inform us how you use the Platform
            (including how long you spend on the Platform) and where you
            have come to the Platform from, so that we can improve the
            Platform and learn which functions of the Platform are most
            popular with users. As we adopt additional technologies, we
            may also gather additional information through other methods.
            Most web and mobile device browsers automatically accept
            cookies but, if you prefer, you can change your browser to
            prevent that or to notify you each time a cookie is set. You
            can also learn more about cookies by visiting
            www.allaboutcookies.org, which includes additional useful
            information on cookies and how to block cookies using
            different types of browsers or mobile devices.
            You may also consult the "Help" section of your browser for
            more information (e.g., Internet Explorer; Google Chrome;
            Mozilla Firefox; or Apple Safari). You can also manage the use
            of Flash technologies, including cookies and local storage
            objects with the Flash management tools available at Adobe's
            website. Please note that by blocking any or all cookies, you
            may not have access to certain features or offerings of the
            Services.
            If you are accessing our Services through a mobile device, you
            can also update your privacy settings on your device by
            setting the “Limit Ad Tracking” and Diagnostics and Usage
            setting property located in the settings screen of your Apple
            iPhone or iPad, or by resetting your Android ID through apps
            that are available in the Play Store. You can also limit
            information collection by uninstalling the App on your device
            and you can use the standard uninstall process available as
            part of your device for this purpose.
    C. Information From Social Networking Services
       One of the special features of the Services is that it may allow
       you to enable or log into the Services via various social
       networking services like Facebook or Twitter ("Social Networking
       Service(s)"). By directly integrating these services, we aim to
       make your online experiences richer and more personalized. To take
       advantage of this feature, we will ask you to provide your
       credentials for the applicable Social Networking Service in order
       to log-in to our Services. When you add a Social Networking
       Services account to the Services or log into the Services using
       your Social Networking Services account, we will collect relevant
       information necessary to enable the Services to access that Social
       Networking Service and your data contained within that Social
       Networking Service. As part of such integration, the Social
       Networking Service will provide us with access to certain
       information (including, for example, your name and photograph, as
       well as other information that you permit the Social Network
       Service to share with us) that you have provided to the Social
       Networking Service, and we will use, store, and disclose such
       information in accordance with this Privacy Policy. However, please
       remember that the manner in which Social Networking Services use,
       store, and disclose your information is governed by the policies of
       such third parties, and GoFundMe shall have no liability or
       responsibility for the privacy practices or other actions of any
       Social Networking Services that may be enabled within the Services.
       You may also have the option of posting your Services activities to
       Social Networking Services when you access content through the
       Services (for example, you may post to Facebook that you performed
       an activity on the Platform); you acknowledge that if you choose to
       use this feature, your friends, followers, and subscribers on any
       Social Networking Services you have enabled will be able to view
       such activity.
       Please visit the privacy policy of the relevant Social Networking
       Service to find out more information about your rights and choices.

   Our Use of Information Collected

   GoFundMe uses the information collected from the Services in a manner
   that is consistent with this Privacy Policy. If you start a campaign,
   we may reach out to you to provide helpful tips or advice in connection
   with your campaign. If you provide information for a certain reason, we
   may use the information in connection with the reason for which it was
   provided. For instance, if you contact us by email, we will use the
   information you provide to answer your question or resolve your
   problem. Also, if you provide information about yourself, or have
   provided (or otherwise permitted the Services to access) any
   Third-Party Data, we will use your information and any such Third-Party
   Data to provide you with access to such services and to monitor your
   use of such services. For the purposes of the GDPR, we may use your
   information in the above ways as this is necessary for us to fulfill
   our obligations under our contract with you or in order to take steps
   at your request prior to entering into a contract.

   GoFundMe may also use the information we collect through the Services
   to help us in providing the Services and support services, processing
   transactions, fulfilling requests for information, receiving and
   sending communications, updating marketing lists, analyzing data and
   research aimed at improving the accuracy, effectiveness, usability or
   popularity of the Services, to personalize the content and advertising
   that you see on Services and to understand how users interact with and
   user our advertisement and Services, to associate your activities,
   customize content or tailor advertising across different device and
   browsers that you use to access the Services (for instance, computers,
   tablets, mobile devices, applications and websites), to comply with
   state, local, federal or international laws, to enforce our Terms of
   Service and this Privacy Policy, as otherwise described in this Privacy
   Policy, or in assisting with other tasks from time to time. Please note
   that we may combine information that we collect from you and about you
   (including automatically-collected information) with information we
   obtain about you from our affiliates and/or non-affiliated third
   parties, and use such combined information in accordance with this
   Privacy Policy. For the purposes of the GDPR, we may use your
   information in the above ways as this is necessary: (i) to fulfill our
   obligations under our contract with you or in order to take steps at
   your request prior to entering into a contract; (ii) for our legitimate
   interest to maintain our relationship with you or protect you and us
   against fraud; or (iv) to comply with legal obligations.

   We may also use the information collected from the “Information We
   Collect” section, such as device identifiers and MAC addresses, to
   associate users’ activities, customize content, or tailor advertising
   to those users across different devices and browsers (for instance,
   tablets, mobile devices and applications, and websites). For the
   purposes of the GDPR, we may use your information in the above ways as
   this is necessary: (i) to fulfil our obligations under our contract
   with you or in order to take steps at your request prior to entering
   into a contract; (ii) for our legitimate interest to maintain our
   relationship with you or protect you and us against fraud; or (iv) to
   comply with legal obligations.

   GoFundMe may use the information collected through the Services to
   contact you about services we believe will be of interest to you. In
   some cases, we will seek your permission. In each marketing
   communication we send you will contain instructions permitting you to
   "opt-out" of receiving future marketing communications. In addition, if
   at any time you wish not to receive any future marketing communications
   or you wish to have your name deleted from our mailing lists, please
   contact us as indicated below. If you opt out of receiving marketing
   communications or other information we think may interest you, as
   discussed below, we may still send you emails about your account or any
   Services you have requested or received from us.

   We may also use data collected through the Services to send
   communications relating to the Services, in accordance with applicable
   laws. For example, we may send periodic emails to registered users of
   the Services relating to their recent interactions with the Services,
   such as donating to a campaign or "hearting" a campaign. Also, if you
   use any feature of the Services permitting you to communicate with
   third parties (such as to refer a third party to the Services or to
   communicate with them regarding a campaign or a donation), either by
   submitting Third-Party Data to the Services or otherwise permitting the
   Services to automatically access Third-Party Data in your possession,
   you acknowledge and agree that you have the authority of the relevant
   third party for us to access and use the relevant Third-Party Data and
   that you have notified these third parties and informed them how their
   information is collected and used by GoFundMe to provide the Services.
   We reserve the right to identify you as the person who has made the
   referral in any messages that are sent to them. We may use Third-Party
   Data to (1) contact such third party using the Third-Party Data
   provided, and/or (2) provide you with an editable template message
   designed to facilitate communication between you and such third party
   through the Services. In addition to sending the foregoing
   communications, we may also send reminders or related messages to you
   and to third parties on your behalf from time to time where permitted
   by applicable law. In each case, any such communications sent to third
   parties using Third-Party Data will provide a means to "opt-out" of
   receiving further communication of the same nature.

   Mobile Services: If you access the Services through a mobile device,
   you agree that we may communicate with you regarding GoFundMe by SMS,
   MMS, text message, or other electronic means to your mobile device. In
   the event you change or deactivate your mobile telephone number, you
   agree to promptly update your GoFundMe account information to ensure
   that your messages are not misdirected. Please note that your wireless
   service carrier’s standard charges, data rates, and other fees may
   apply where you access the Services through a mobile device. In
   addition, downloading, installing, or using certain Services on a
   mobile device may be prohibited or restricted by your carrier, and not
   all Services may work with all carriers or devices. By using the
   Services on a mobile device, you agree that we may communicate with you
   regarding GoFundMe by SMS, MMS, text message, or other electronic means
   to your mobile device. In the event you change or deactivate your
   mobile telephone number, you agree to promptly update your GoFundMe
   account information to ensure that your messages are not misdirected.
   Our Disclosure of Information Collected Through the Services

   There are certain circumstances in which we may share information
   collected through the Services with certain third parties without
   further notice to you, as set forth below:
    A. Business Transfers:
       As we develop our business, we might sell or buy businesses or
       assets. In the event of a corporate sale, merger, reorganization,
       dissolution, similar event, or steps taken in anticipation of such
       events (e.g., due diligence in a transaction), user information may
       be part of the transferred assets.
    B. Agents, Consultants, Vendors and Related Third Parties:
       GoFundMe, like many businesses, sometimes hires other companies to
       perform certain business-related functions on its behalf, and we
       may provide access to or share your information with these
       companies so they can perform services for us. Examples of such
       functions include marketing, mailing information, data storage,
       security, fraud preventions, payment processing, legal services,
       and maintaining databases. For example, if you are a donor in
       Australia, GoFundMe’s Australian entity, GoFundMe Australia Pty Ltd
       (ACN 627 702 630) contracts with Adyen Australia for payment
       processing. Adyen Australia, therefore, will collect, process and
       store your data on behalf of GoFundMe.
    C. Legal Requirements:
       GoFundMe may access, disclose, transfer and preserve your
       information when we have a good faith belief that doing so is
       necessary to: (i) comply with the law including with subpoenas,
       search warrants, court orders, and other legal process; and respond
       to inquiries or requests from government, regulatory, law
       enforcement, public authorities, or content protection
       organizations; (ii) protect and defend the legal rights, privacy,
       safety or property of GoFundMe, its affiliates, subsidiaries,
       employees, agents, contractors, or its users; (iii) permit us to
       pursue available remedies, commence, participate in, or defend
       litigation, or limit the damages we may sustain; or (iv) enforce
       this Privacy Policy or any applicable Terms of Service.
    D. Campaign Organizers
       If you donate to a fundraising campaign, we may share your name,
       email address and other information you’ve provided in connection
       with your donation with the campaign organizer, who may contact
       you. By donating to the campaign, you consent to our sharing the
       above information and to the campaign organizer contacting you.
    E. Your consent
       We may share your information in the event that you consent to the
       sharing of your information. For example, we may partner with third
       party organizations to arrange for specific campaigns. If you
       consent to our delivering your contact information to a specific
       partner, we may share, with the partner organization, your name,
       email address and other information you’ve provided in connection
       with your donation to the specific campaign.
    F. Aggregate and/or De-Identified Information
       We may aggregate and/or de-identify your information so that the
       information no longer relates to you individually. Our use and
       disclosures of such aggregated or de-identified information is not
       subject to this Privacy Policy, and may be disclosed to others
       without limitation and for any purpose.
    G. Analytics
       We may use third-party web analytics services on our Services, such
       as those of Google Analytics. These service providers use the sort
       of technology previously described in the “Cookies and other
       electronic technologies” section to help us analyze how users use
       the Services, including by noting the third-party website from
       which you arrive, and provide certain features to you. The
       information (including your IP address) collected by the technology
       will be disclosed to or collected directly by these service
       providers, who use the information to evaluate your use of the
       Services. This information may be used to place interest-based
       advertisements on the Platform. This may result in you seeing
       advertisements for our Platform when you visit other websites. To
       prevent Google Analytics from using your information for analytics,
       you may install the Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on by
       clicking here.

   Tailored Advertising

   We may use third-party advertising technologies that allow for the
   delivery of relevant content and advertising on our Platform, as well
   as on other websites you visit. The ads may be based on various factors
   such as the content of the page you are visiting, information you enter
   such as your age and gender, your searches, demographic data,
   user-generated content, and other information we collect from you.
   These ads may be based on your current activity or your activity over
   time and across other websites and online services and may be tailored
   to your interests.

   Also, third parties whose products or services are accessible or
   advertised on our Platform may place cookies or other tracking
   technologies on your computer, mobile phone, or other device to collect
   information about your use of the website as discussed above. We also
   allow other third parties (e.g., ad networks and ad servers such as
   Google Analytics, DoubleClick and others) to serve tailored ads to you
   on our website, other sites, and in other applications, and to access
   their own cookies or other tracking technologies on your computer,
   mobile phone, or other device you use to access the website. We may
   provide our customer information (such as a hashed version of your
   email addresses) to service providers, who may “match” this information
   in de-identified form to cookies (or mobile ad identifiers) and other
   proprietary IDs, in order to target or “retarget” you with ads when you
   visit other websites and mobile applications. (You may opt out of these
   many of these service providers as described in the next paragraph.)

   We neither have access to, nor does this Privacy Policy govern, the use
   of cookies or other tracking technologies that may be placed on your
   computer, mobile phone, or other device you use to access our website
   by non-affiliated, third-party ad technology, ad servers, ad networks
   or any other non-affiliated third parties. Those parties that use these
   technologies may offer you a way to opt out of ad targeting as
   described below.

   If you receive tailored advertising on your computer through a web
   browser, you can learn more about such tailored browser advertising and
   how you can generally control cookies from being put on your computer
   to deliver tailored advertising, by visiting the European Interactive
   Digital Advertising Alliance Consumer Ad Choices link for EU based
   advertising or for US based advertising either: (i) the Network
   Advertising Initiative’s Consumer Opt-Out link or (ii) the Digital
   Advertising Alliance’s Consumer Opt-Out link to opt-out of receiving
   tailored advertising from companies that participate in those programs.
   To opt out of Google Analytics for display advertising or customize
   Google display network ads, you can visit the Google Ads Settings page.

   Please note that to the extent advertising technology is integrated
   into our website or other websites that you visit, you may still
   receive advertisements even if you opt-out. In that case, the
   advertising will not be tailored to your interests. Also, we do not
   control any of the above opt-out links or whether any particular
   company chooses to participate in these opt-out programs. We are not
   responsible for any choices you make using these mechanisms or the
   continued availability or accuracy of these mechanisms.
   Unsolicited Information

   Please be advised that some information you provide may be publicly
   accessible, such as information posted in forums or comment sections.
   We may also collect information through customer support
   communications, your communication to us of ideas for new products or
   modifications to existing products, and other unsolicited submissions
   (collectively, with publicly-accessible information, "Unsolicited
   Information"). By sending us Unsolicited Information, you further (a)
   agree that we are under no obligation of confidentiality, express or
   implied, with respect to the Unsolicited Information, (b) acknowledge
   that we may have something similar to the Unsolicited Information
   already under consideration or in development, (c) grant us an
   irrevocable, non-exclusive, royalty-free, perpetual, worldwide license
   to use, modify, prepare derivative works, publish, distribute and
   sublicense the Unsolicited Information, and (iv) irrevocably waive, and
   cause to be waived, against GoFundMe and its users any claims and
   assertions of any moral rights contained in such Unsolicited
   Information. This Unsolicited Information section shall survive any
   termination of your account or the Services. This Privacy Policy
   otherwise does not apply to any information collected by GoFundMe other
   than information collected through the Services.
   Children

   Our Services are not designed for use by individuals under the age of
   13(or 16 in Europe). If you are under the age of 13(or 16 in Europe),
   please do not use the Services and/or submit any information through
   the Services. If you have reason to believe that a child under the age
   of 13(or 16 in Europe) has provided personal information to GoFundMe
   through the Services, please contact us support@gofundme.com, and we
   will delete that information from our databases to the extent required
   by law.
   Links to Other Web Sites

   This Privacy Policy applies only to the Services. The Services may
   contain links to other web sites not operated or controlled by GoFundMe
   (the "Third-Party Sites"). The policies and procedures we described
   here do not apply to the Third-Party Sites. The links from the Services
   do not imply that GoFundMe endorses or has reviewed the Third-Party
   Sites. We suggest contacting those sites directly for information on
   their respective privacy policies.
   Security

   GoFundMe has implemented technical and organizational security measures
   to protect the Personal Data provided via the Services from loss,
   misuse, and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, or
   destruction. For example, limiting access to information only to
   employees and authorized service providers who need to know such
   information for the purposes of this Privacy Notice. However, no
   Internet or email transmission is ever fully secure or error free. In
   particular, email sent to or from the Services may not be secure.
   Therefore, you should take special care in deciding what information
   you send to us via email. Please keep this in mind when disclosing any
   information to GoFundMe via the Internet.
   Do-Not-Track Signals

   Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in
   certain web browsers. We do not recognize or respond to
   browser-initiated DNT signals, as the Internet industry is currently
   still working toward defining exactly what DNT means, what it means to
   comply with DNT, and a common approach to responding to DNT. To learn
   more about Do Not Track, you can do so here.
   Retention of your information

   We will only retain the information for as long as necessary for the
   purpose for which that information was collected and to the extent
   permitted or required by applicable laws. When we no longer need to use
   your information, we will remove it from our systems and records and/or
   take step to anonymize it so that you can no longer be identified from
   it in accordance with our internal document retention policies.
   Access to Information

   You may access and correct certain information about you by visiting
   the “Account Settings” portion of our Platform. You may also request in
   writing copies of personal information about you held by us. If that
   information is inaccurate, please let us know and we will endeavor to
   make the necessary amendments, erase, or block the relevant information
   as you request. For more information on your rights if you are in
   Europe, please see the "Users in Europe” section below.
   Privacy Shield

   GoFundMe has certified with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield
   as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the
   collection, use, and retention of “personal data” (as defined under the
   Privacy Shield principles) from applicable European countries. GoFundMe
   has certified that it adheres to the Privacy Shield Principles of
   notice, choice, onward transfer, security, data integrity, access, and
   enforcement for such personal data. To learn more about the Privacy
   Shield Framework, visit the Department of Commerce’s Privacy Shield
   list by clicking here.

   As required under the principles, when GoFundMe receives information
   under the Privacy Shield and then transfers it to a third-party service
   provider acting as an agent on GoFundMe’s behalf, GoFundMe has certain
   liability under the Privacy Shield if both (i) the agent processes the
   information in a manner inconsistent with the Privacy Shield and (ii)
   GoFundMe is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.

   If you have any questions or complaints about GoFundMe’s privacy
   practices, including questions related to the Privacy Shield, you may
   contact us at the email address or mailing address set forth under
   “Contacting GoFundMe.” We will work with you to resolve your issue.

   If you are a resident of the European Union or Switzerland and are
   dissatisfied with the manner in which we have addressed your concerns
   about our privacy practices, you may seek further assistance, at no
   cost to you, from our designated Privacy Shield independent recourse
   mechanism, the JAMS Privacy Shield Program, which you can learn more
   about by visiting https://www.jamsadr.com/eu-us-privacy-shield.

   Residents of the European Union or Switzerland may elect to arbitrate
   unresolved complaints but prior to initiating such arbitration, you
   must: (1) contact GoFundMe and afford us the opportunity to resolve the
   issue; (2) seek assistance from GoFundMe’s designated independent
   recourse mechanism above; and (3) contact the U.S. Department of
   Commerce (either directly or through a European Data Protection
   Authority) and afford the Department of Commerce time to attempt to
   resolve the issue. Each party shall be responsible for its own
   attorney’s fees. Please be advised that, pursuant to the Privacy
   Shield, the arbitrator(s) may only impose individual-specific,
   non-monetary, equitable relief necessary to remedy any violation of the
   Privacy Shield Principles with respect to the individual. GoFundMe is
   subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal
   Trade Commission (FTC).
   Users in Europe

     * Access. You have the right to request a copy of the information we
       are processing about you.
     * Rectification. You have the right to have incomplete or inaccurate
       information that we process about you rectified.
     * Deletion. You have the right to request that we delete information
       that we process about you, except we are not obliged to do so if we
       need to retain such data in order to comply with a legal obligation
       or to establish, exercise or defend legal claims.
     * Restriction. You have the right to restrict our processing of your
       information where you believe such data to be inaccurate; our
       processing is unlawful; or that we no longer need to process such
       data for a particular purpose unless we are not able to delete the
       data due to a legal or other obligation or because you do not wish
       for us to delete it.
     * Portability. You have the right to obtain information we hold about
       you in a structured, electronic format, and to transmit such data
       to another data controller, where this is (a) information that you
       have provided to us, and (b) if we are processing that data solely
       on the basis of your consent or to perform a contract with you.
     * Objection. Where the legal basis for processing your information is
       our legitimate interest, you have the right to object to such
       processing on grounds relating to your particular situation. We
       will abide by your request unless we have compelling legitimate
       grounds for the processing which override your interests, or if we
       need to continue to process the data for the establishment,
       exercise or defence of a legal claim.
     * Withdrawing consent. If you have consented to our processing of
       your information, you have the right to withdraw your consent at
       any time, free of charge. This includes where you wish to opt out
       from marketing messages.

   You can make a request to exercise any of these rights in relation to
   your information by sending the request to us at the email address or
   mailing address set forth under "Contacting GoFundMe". For your own
   privacy and security, at our discretion, we may require you to provide
   your identity before providing the requested information. Please note
   that GoFundMe may take up to 30 days to fulfill such requests.

   You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the local data
   protection authority if you believe that we have not complied with
   applicable data protection laws. A list of local data protection
   authorities in European countries is available here.
   Other Terms and Conditions

   Your access to and use of the Services is subject to the Terms of
   Service at https://fr.gofundme.com/terms and such other terms, which
   may be made available to you in connection with your use of the
   Services.
   Changes to GoFundMe's Privacy Policy

   The Services and our business may change from time to time. As a
   result, at times it may be necessary for GoFundMe to make changes to
   this Privacy Policy. GoFundMe reserves the right to update or modify
   this Privacy Policy at any time and from time to time. If you disagree
   with our revisions to the Privacy Policy, you may de-activate your
   account or discontinue the use of our Services. Please review this
   policy periodically, and especially before you provide us with any
   information through the Services. This Privacy Policy was last updated
   on the date indicated above. Your continued use of the Services after
   any changes or revisions to this Privacy Policy shall indicate your
   agreement with the terms of such revised Privacy Policy.

   If you are in Europe, you will not be required to agree to changes to
   this Privacy Policy, unless we specifically seek your consent.
   Contacting GoFundMe

   Please also feel free to contact us if you have any questions about
   GoFundMe's Privacy Policy or the information practices of the Services.

   You may contact us as follows:

   Legal Department
   855 Jefferson Avenue
   P.O. Box 1329
   Redwood City, CA 94063

   support@gofundme.com

   For the purposes of the GDPR, you may contact our Data Protection
   Officer: legal@gofundme.com.

Common Questions

   Learn more about GoFundMe and how it can help you fundraise.
   Learn More

Download the App

   Our native Android and iOS apps unlock GoFundMe's full potential!
   Available on the App Store
   Get it on Google Play

Why GoFundMe?

     * Mobile-Friendly Campaigns
     * No penalties for missing goal
     * GoFundMe Mobile App

     * No deadlines or goal requirements
     * Expert advice, 24/7
     * Keep every donation you receive

   Start a GoFundMe

#1 Fundraising platform

   People have raised more money on GoFundMe than anywhere else.
   How it works

GoFundMe Guarantee

   Your donation is protected. If anything is not right, we’ll give you a
   full refund.
   Learn more

GoFundMe app

   Our Android and iOS apps make it easy to fundraise on-the-go.
   Download
     * Get Started
          + How It Works
          + Why GoFundMe
          + Common Questions
          + Success Stories
          + Sign Up Now
     * Top Categories
          + Medical Fundraising
          + Memorial Fundraising
          + Charity Fundraising
     * Learn More
          + About Us
          + GoFundMe Stories
          + Press
          + Campaign Tips
          + We're Hiring!
     * Get Support
          + Help Center
          + Supported Countries & Currencies
          + Blog

   [English (US)]
   Get Started
     * How It Works
     * Why GoFundMe
     * Common Questions
     * Success Stories
     * Sign Up Now

   Top Categories
     * Medical Fundraising
     * Memorial Fundraising
     * Charity Fundraising

   Learn More
     * About Us
     * GoFundMe Stories
     * Press
     * Campaign Tips
     * We're Hiring!

   Get Support
     * Help Center
     * Supported Countries & Currencies
     * Blog

     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal

   © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     *
     *
     *
     *

     * © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal

     *
     *
     *
     *
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate

   IFRAME: https://www.google-analytics.com/gtm/ns?id=GTM-KJFLHK

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-TDTFTZ

     * (BUTTON) Search
     * (BUTTON) Discover
          + Fundraisers
          + Success Stories
     * (BUTTON) Fundraise for
          + Medical
          + Memorial
          + Emergency
          + Nonprofit
          + Education
          + See all

   (BUTTON)
   Search GoFundMe
   ____________________ (BUTTON)
   See all results for
     *

   (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON)
       How it works
          + How it works
            How GoFundMe works
            What is crowdfunding?
            Free fundraising
          + Plan your fundraiser
            Team fundraising
            Fundraising tips
            Fundraising ideas
     * Sign in
     * Start a GoFundMe

   (BUTTON)
     * (BUTTON) Discover
          + Fundraisers
          + Success Stories
     * (BUTTON) Fundraise for
          + Medical
          + Memorial
          + Emergency
          + Nonprofit
          + Education
          + See all
     * (BUTTON) How it works
          + How GoFundMe works
          + What is crowdfunding?
          + Free fundraising
     * (BUTTON) Plan your fundraiser
          + Team fundraising
          + Fundraising tips
          + Fundraising ideas
     * Sign in
     * Start a GoFundMe

Free fundraising for the people and causes you care about

   Starting is easy. 0% platform fee*.
   Start a GoFundMe
   Paola raised over €136,000 to expand her wildlife sanctuary and save
   more animals in need.
   George’s family raised $8k for a new wheelchair to get him moving
   again.
   In 2017, the GoFundMe community raised millions of dollars for
   hurricane relief efforts. (Photo by The National Guard, CC, Adapted)
   The BFC Preussen team raised more than €1,200 for transportation to
   competitions.
   *Standard transaction fees apply to credit and debit card transactions
   Paola raised over €136,000 to expand her wildlife sanctuary and save
   more animals in need.
   George’s family raised $8k for a new wheelchair to get him moving
   again.
   In 2017, the GoFundMe community raised millions of dollars for
   hurricane relief efforts. (Photo by The National Guard, CC, Adapted)
   The BFC Preussen team raised more than €1,200 for transportation to
   competitions.

Free fundraising for the people and causes you care about

   Starting is easy. 0% platform fee*.
   Start a GoFundMe
   *Standard transaction fees apply to credit and debit card transactions

Start fundraising today

   More money raised online than anywhere else. Learn about how GoFundMe
   works.
   For yourself
   For a friend

   GoFundMe fundraising stories
   Fighting persecution abroad

   To help protect the vulnerable LGBT community in Chechnya, Guillaume
   and Benjamin raised €27,550 from more than 700 donors.
   GoFundMe fundraising stories
   Hope for a special needs child

   To help her autistic daughter cope with significant cognitive and
   social challenges, Justine raised €11,935 for behavioral therapy.
   GoFundMe fundraising stories
   A community to the rescue

   The mountaineering community raised €160,223 to rescue Elisabeth and to
   help the wife and children of her climbing partner Tomek, who lost his
   life on the mountain.

Over 10,000 people start a GoFundMe every day

   Medical
   Memorial
   Emergency
   Nonprofit
   Education
   Animals
   Business
   Community
   Competition
   Creative
   Event
   Faith
   Family
   Newlywed
   Sports
   Travel
   Volunteer
   Wishes
   Show all categories

Ready to start fundraising?

   Start a GoFundMe

   [English (US)]
   Fundraise for
     * Medical
     * Emergency
     * Memorial
     * Education
     * Nonprofit

   Learn more
     * How GoFundMe works
     * Why GoFundMe
     * Common questions
     * Success stories
     * Supported countries

   Resources
     * Help center
     * Blog
     * GoFundMe Stories
     * Press center
     * Careers
     * About

   © 2010-2019 GoFundMe
     * Terms
     * Privacy
     * Legal
